Crowd was very good yesterday. Very different from usual Ljubljana concert public. People were respoding to her, dancing and just enjoying her music.
Tabs are great because they add functionality that you had before. People don't come back to your fan page unless you directed them there. You can keep them on FB by using a tab to have them sign up for your newsletter or feed and then they can go back to their newsfeed on FB, which is where they want to be.
My mother taught me while I was a teenager to save for retirement and to save for a downpayment for a house, and I did. One of the best services we could do for our kids is to teach them that if they start saving when they are young, life is so much easier in the long run. It is hard to start saving for retirement at 45. It is so much better at 25. I know cash is strapped at 25, but you don't need a big-screen TV. You don't need to eat out every night. You don't need all the latest gadgets. It may seem like responsibility is a long way off, but think instead of these years as the easy years, the free years. You don't have any major expenses, so now is the time when saving is actually the easiest. So save. Be responsible. Don't just waste your life away until responsibility hits. Act responsibly now, and you'll be so much more comfortable in the end.
He then decided to call up Iqra, knowing that she would have got up by now. However dejection greeted him when he called her because her phone was still switched off. Letting out a deep sigh, he decided to go back to his room and try sleeping again. Hence he came back to his room, pulled his blankets over him and tried to sleep once again. Almost an hour had passed and there was still no sign of sleep. He was still tossing and turning in his bed, when suddenly he felt the phone vibrate.
Double Mountain's Little G ESB was just want you want: a special beer, done well, that is perfect for cask.
4. Cougar Town: Not really teen angst but boy does Cougar Town being back make me happy. Cougar Town is what I hope my life could be like when I’m forty. Or sooner.
I used two lovely stamps from an Inkadinkado set, stamped with Versamark then used WOW! Black Twinkle embossing glitter - hard to photograph, but the effect is great IRL really twinkly.
In parallel, the supply chain will also change, and this will have an impact on global trade. As objects are increasingly printed locally the number of items that are manufactured and transported from remote, low cost economies will be reduced. There is likely to be an opportunity for low cost economies, however, to produce the consumables required for 3D printing, such as the build materials used by 3D printers.
Tobey
“Hey!”, I replied. “I didn’t know you guys were friends.”
Could you imagine taking over some/all of the tasks connected to running Thing-a-day?
David picked up KFC for us for lunch. We ate in the car. About half way back, I thought a movie would be good. So I put in Lion King in the DVD. She watched for sometime and then looked more and more out the window. I thought she might be getting bored. Well, about 20 minutes went by and I knew the problem. She kind of gagged and I told Lynn to get a bag from my purse but we missed most of it. Poor thing. Did this mom know she gets car sick? Yes, I did but she had been doing so well that I thought they might have been mistaken. I felt so bad for the driver, he has a mess in the back of his very nice van. We offered to clean it up but David said he told him to take it in to be cleaned and we would pay for it.
Based on my experience and my predecessors experience, and the literature their predecessors have composed… sitting still in a seated position with the intention of being the witness- does effectively create a profound experience for the nervous system and the mental fluctuations…
Here's what it's like to me. After pushing the send button, a big gate opened. (Think large wooden gate that's very intimidating and heavy.) When I walk through it, I enter a field of wildflowers that seem to stretch for miles. Beautiful colors of reds, yellows, purples, and blues. They're about waist high, and when a warm breeze blows, they dance. In the blue sky above, there are some clouds that spell the word--Possibilities.
Still on football… Anyone see the new CFL jerseys? Pretty awesome, eh? I heard Fashion Television’s Jeannie Beker this morning on TSN Radio 1050 and she knows her CFL football. She liked them and so do I. You can see them here; http://www.cfl.ca/page/reebok Tell me if you do not also think that the TiCats jersey look the best with the stripes on the sleeves. I still hope they lose every game, but they can look great doing so.
I’ll keep a candle burning in my dark paradise
Each and every one of us holds some position of power, whether in our families or at work, and we must constantly remind ourselves never to abuse the power that is entrusted to us. We can learn leadership lessons that are truly timeless from the Bible, and even though we might not have to write a Torah scroll, we would do well to remember God’s laws and live according to them.
“I look like I’m in a movie.”
_Matthew Nock, 38, Cambridge, Mass. Clinical psychologist and Harvard University psychology professor whose work focuses on suicide and self-injury in adolescents and adults.
Things can be elevated to a god-like status over the internet – maybe it’s gets re-blogged endlessly on Tumblr, maybe it’s been worn beautifully by someone super-chic and captured on a street-style blog, maybe it will forever be immortalised on a page in the designer’s lookbook, pristine and perfect on a model after hours of styling and shooting.
I desire, in this essay, to address these questions. First, however, there needs to be clarity of understanding with the use of the word “love.” Exactly what does one mean when the word “love” is used in a sentence? If we use the standard of God to help us understand love, then we have a starting point to address the questions. Let us use John 3:16, “For God so loved the world…” The word “love” means what in this passage? If we use the English dictionary we come away with this understanding (when used in the noun form): a strong affection for another, a warm attachment, an object of attachment, devotion, and finally, unselfish loyal and benevolent concern for the good of another (there are actually nine definitions, but only the first four did I make use of).[1] Will this give us clarity of understanding? If we apply the first three English ideas of love to John 3:16, we can say that it helps, but I don’t think clarity is in view. We still don’t know what love means, we only know that the Lord has an attachment to His creation.
We met up with Cat and Ross right after work for dinner and then we went to see Lucinda Williams in concert! Reva, you were so right - what an amazing voice she has! Highly recommended.
Now head on over to the Inky Impressions Challenge blog and see the rest of the wonderful cards made by my Inkette pals - you'll love what you see there!
Samson on the drive, could care less about Texas, he was just over the car. Consistent whining and I think now he gets sick to his stomach. This was his post in the car for the majority of the drive.
“What now?” asked Jagred.
“No it isn’t!”
And if he came back through that door right now I'd only tell him to get out again
She had almost reached the other end of the road when two men appeared, walking towards her. She went to cross the road to avoid them but they split up and motioned to each other. Her hazel eyes shot wide when she recognised them from the courtyard. She turned to go back the other way.
Bloodbathed Frostbrood Vanquisher – Glory of the ICC Hero 10
Of course, this is par for the course. Anything that doesn't go the way the Paultards think it should is due to the machinations of some arcane, devious plot by people determined to keep us in bondage to the war machine profiteers, the internationalist bankers, and the career politicians who are in thrall to them all.
to reel you in or catch red herrings
So I put the book aside and figured I wouldn’t read anything more the rest of the night other than blogs. I checked out Jeff Strand’s blog and have to say, I’m still processing it and think I might be scarred for life. LOL
Character Two:
From the First World War onwards, the demand for timber resulted in the planting of fast growing non-native conifers – Sitka spruce and Douglas fir amongst others. Harvesting and extraction of such timber continues today, but, recognising the diminished conservation value of such habitat, the Forestry Commission is working on restoring native woodland by replanting broadleaves.
To take this vessel
Debbie Ford asks the reader, “Are you ready to embark on this journey of reclaiming all of yourself, the light and the dark, your good self and your evil twin? Are you ready to return to the love of your true, total, authentic self rather than stay trapped in the judgmental angst of a disjointed human ego?” If so, “Your job is to learn from the shadow, to integrate it, and allow it to evolved your thinking and expand the boundaries of your self-created persona. Your challenge is to find its value and to bring the light of forgiveness and compassion so that you can defuse its ability to dismantle your life. Your job is to bring its complex characters out from the shadow, and to use their power and potency as sacred fuel to become who you were meant to be in this lifetime.”
I'm awful at telling lies. Some would deem this a good trait, but when it comes to women, it most definitely isn't.
Avery has come so far. Less than two years ago she was in an orphanage and now she's reciting Bible verses! I stand in awe at what only God has done in the life of orphans.
It’s hard to believe this is the first new episode we’ve had in nearly a month. When we last saw our doctors, our mouths were left agape at Owen’s revelation to Cristina that he had indeed been unfaithful. With the show’s time table, we’re picking up a week later, but to us viewers it seems like it’s been much longer.
So those in marriages of convenience should have their applications rejected!
when introduced to someone new. A smile enhances an opportunity to make a lifetime friendship from that connection.
What shall I blog about today?
i'd like to smack her arrogant face
won’t save you now
The first relationship described in the Bible is a marriage, Adam and Eve. God sees that it isn’t good for a man to be alone. It makes sense. God is a trinity, three distinct beings somehow sharing one essence, so it’s only fitting that the crown of creation – humanity – would also need to exist in community.
You have to take the costs of every organisation into account, to ensure none are supplying below whatever arithmetic you’ve used to calculate cost.
dining room table in London is an example of such beauty. She herself is a lifelong collector of beautiful china.
juice of half a lemon (less even, maybe a quarter)
Andy Clockwise – Let Them Eat Cake, To Many Fatties On The Dancefloor (PID)
Anyways I’m happy to be back at it and I would love to hear back with some feedback about fave dystopian or vampire society novels. (and if anyone says twilight so help me Emily Dickinson I will scream in all caps for the next five entries)
“You’re beautiful.”
She replied sensibly: ‘I have been scared, but it’s people that does it.’
This week there was a lot of good stuff to take pictures of. It's been hard to pick just one (or two) pictures for each day.
I looked at my dreams
45. Pottery classes
Me: (dumbfounded) Well, she has an epidural, of course she isn't feeling any contractions.
Soon after, I fell asleep, but not before wanting to write a blog about it. When I got into work, I conversed with my fiancée over email about our dogs and told her that I wanted to write a blog about this experience. I started to write. But before I got far I was flicking around from window to window and came upon my restored firefox websurfing I had done yesterday. One of the tabs had this open. I had not had time to look through it yesterday so I partook a bit and stumbled across this video.
The mobile vibrated on the passenger seat with a two-word text. ‘All set.’ It was the signal.
Hot sauce, for serving
You're strong.
It’s called Foliozo and it’s a portfolio app.
Catching a handful of corrupt billionaires surely cannot be more important than ENDING APARTHEID for an entire nation??? There are 2 ways to work around towards equality though, OTK’s ‘expose corruption method’ (if intended as a method to end apartheid at all . . . I hope) could not be said to be less effective in ending APARTHEID through addressing the UNHCR angle or citizen rights, though the PKFZ issue does distract from the issue of APARTHEID overall.
‘Mystery intervention’ against inquiry Last king of Ireland spins in his grave as Enda ends up reffing red-blue clash Government welcomes review of Finucane inquiry decision Scottish independence: Wales and Northern Ireland make unity plea Fresh doubts over rubber bullet death ‘Heroes with their Hands in the Air’ to be staged in Derry and Belfast Derry’s child poverty shock
Bake in a greased round or square 8 or 9" cake pan, sprinkling the top with sugar, if desired...or in muffin cups (approximately 8 muffins). I made a double batch to take to a party last weekend. I love mine served with sliced, sugared berries and milk. Serve with whipped cream or ice cream if desired.
I am so thankful for the support and love my Dear husband gave me through all this. He had a hard time as well, but was always put me first. I know hes going to be the best daddy any child could ever ask for. So once we get our medical bills paid down a bit were going to start trying again. This baby was unexpected, but now its almost needed. But until it comes, we got one more angel looking out for us :)
As an evidence for how far this has permeated into our cultural consciousness, I took a picture of a card I discovered while buying my wife a mother’s day card. Wouldn’t you feel so much better about yourself if you received this card this year? You aren’t to blame for your child’s string of terrible life choices after all!
Today I saw a photo.
I needed a card for my cousins wee one who will be two next month so I killed two birds with one stone. Don't you just love it when things work out for you:)
There are a million riffs on this basic recipe — think sun-dried tomatoes, cumin, fresh basil, roasted garlic, olives, or feta cheese — so just listen to your heart. Yesterday my heart said fresh cilantro (coriander) and smoked paprika.
Because He rose, so too shall we who believe.
Happy World Book Day folks! Today is one of my very favourite days of the year for anyone out of the loop World Book Day happens once a year and booky sorts like publishers, authors, librarians, book sellers etc. get together to promote reading (especially in children) as much as possible. All around the world book shops and schools celebrate by hosting fun events for the kids, like going to school dressed as your favourite book character, and readings and games with authors. World Book Day is more famously known though as being the day where children under the age of 18 who are in full time education are entitled to a free World Book Day book and so are given a £1 book token that they can use to get one of the specially selected £1 books for free from their local bookshop.
e) Lightning has been seen now, therefore thunder will be heard soon.
The colours of the bottom row are far earthier and remind me of the boho trend going around at the moment. 'Paper Bag' would make a fantastic eyebrow filler for dark haired girls; I actually used up the ENTIRE pan of dark brown in the Smokey palette this way!
Thank you… for it all. XOXO
The tale of earth’s unhonored things 45
I almost totally forgot to post this amazing recipe! So, protein shakes make me wanna vomit…therefore I decided to see if putting it into some “baked goods” would help to disguise the taste. It most certainly did. I LOVE these muffins! They are extremely healthy for you (minus the brown sugar). So try this recipe if you want to incorporate more protein into your eating schedule…..you won’t be disappointed.
Evelyn Waugh, Officers and Gentlemen. This novel is the middle book of Waugh’s trilogy about the adventures of Guy Crouchback during World War II. I read the first book, Men at Arms, but too long ago, so I had trouble keeping the many characters straight. Vintage Waugh, in which the capers of the officers come up against the realities of the evacuation of Crete.
Do I want every animal I come in contact with to have the best chance what-so-ever? Absolutely -
that form the loopholes
In this first fairly simple recipe I used 3 Spring Textures
Send healthy vibes, Internetz, I needs them.
6. I already know the gender of my baby. :)
“I have been in Singapore for four years and I never met such a person. I can say for as long as I live, I have never been scolded a ‘dog’ by anybody.”
Which brings me to the premise of the book. It is a simple story, about a girl who, while wandering around the woods while making a flower chain, meets an old woman in a peaceful clearing. The old woman asks the girl for the flower chain she is making and, in return, promises the girl that she will get the wish she had been thinking (it would be bad of me to reveal that wish here). After a slight hesitation, the girl slips the flower chain over the woman’s neck, and runs back to her parents who are calling her.
4. The color choices are great. We chose "Linen" and I'm really happy with the result. There are lots of other great colors to choose from as well!
I can't believe we're in April already - where is this year going?......soon be Christmas! Lol
A total thumbs up from me on this one, go and buy! Or at least try the vanilla milk and raspberry…you will never want to drink a shower gel more in your life!
The rewards that could await companies that solve these problems are their ability to compete on value and convenience will allow shorten sales cycles and more consumers that are educated.
The butterflies were EI stamps and TH movers and shapers butterflies all coloured with the DIs. I have used TH mini pins and pen nibs for the bodies of the butterflies, and some builder's scrim on the bases. All the products I used are available from the Craft Den.
They demonstrate the commonality between pious disciples of all faiths including Multiculturalism: When reality unfolds in ways that do not conform to the particular ideology, the devout believers will put their fingers in their ears, hum "la la la la, we're right, not listening" and become defensive and even angry and violent should anybody have the nerve to suggest that we put reality first and act accordingly even if it means acting contrary to the pet ideology.
Fennel, ½ teaspoon, add to curry paste
If it were not for the inaction of government to deal properly with this form of Islamic fascism there would be no need for groups such as The English Defence League, Welsh Defence League, Scottish Defence League and Ulster Defence League to counter this threat on the streets and on-line. Appeasing those who follow an ideology of hatred, murder and intolerance hardly enhances “community cohesion”, it destroys it. Our movement is purely set up to pressure whatever government we have in power to deal with this menace and undo all the damage caused by apathy and appeasement. We oppose the introduction of sharia law into our legal system because sharia law allows a husband to “beat” his wife! Is that acceptable behaviour in the 21st century we ask????
Oldereid NB, Rui H, Purvis K. Male infertility. Significance of life and occupation. (Norwegian) Tidsskr Nor Laegeforen 1994; 114: 3308-3311.
The First Law is that of inertia. I placed a baseball card on top of a glass, and then stacked coins on top of the card. I asked them to predict what would happen to the coins when I horizontally flicked the card away (they said the coins would fly off everywhere.) Of course they dropped into the glass, and I let them try it a few times. I also gave each of them some thick paper (bookmarks, actually) and a stack of pennies. I instructed them to place the bookmark on the edge of the table so half of it was off of it and then to put a stack of coins on the bookmark. They quickly pulled the bookmark out from under the coins and the stack remained intact on the table. (The boys, of course, experimented with ways to make the coins spill...)
Now, I say to you today my friends, even though we face the difficulties of today and tomorrow, I still have a dream…
Our garden is off to a great start so far and we hope to keep it that way. With over 25 years of gardening experience Whitney Farms® has improved their products to have:
No power meant the building was dark. The city, and consequently the building, were flooded, which meant it was moist. With exceptions for some of the luckier areas, pretty much every service was suspended, which meant no mail and no trash pickup. Trash bags were accumulating anywhere that people lived, here included, and when they had run out of trash bags, people had started littering, throwing their trash out the windows or leaving it in hallways instead. To top it off, the weather was getting warmer.
Mark is clearly delighted to be back in the world of everyone's favourite Time Lord. "Doctor Who is such a fantastic show and the fans' loyalty is incredible,' he commented. 'The music has been a key component in the success of the show; it's instantaneously identifiable and spine-tingling. I can't wait to hear the sounds of the Melbourne Symphony Orchestra - and the Tardis - filling Plenary Hall."
In Europe, the answer to the consequences of Post WW2 Leftist/Marxist policies is the European right. In America, the majority of voters will choose hard Marxism as the cure for incremental Marxism. You can debate this, but it is playing out. When has the leftward march been turned back in our country? It has not. Not ever Reagan reversed it, although it could be said he slowed it for a while.
Today I am a bit bored. It is an overcast Sunday, my husband is working and my daughter is busy doing her own thing. I could be writing an article, working on my new author website, working on a friend's website or even editing a book. I am however doing none of those things.
There are people out there who won't chose the path you want them to
“Is that a silverfish?”
The best way to do this is to step up the fight to defend jobs and services!
* Jane Krakowski as Corma Limbs (This is the movie variation of Cormac Limbs, the male character on whom the character is based.)
That at least 51% of the activities of its San Francisco office were devoted to defending Israel.
So we drilled it out so that it would fit
“We didn’t field it slowly because we had fiscal challenges – it took us that long to get the understanding over time of what was actually happening.”
The bad thing about watching the movie 1st is that you read and already have a vision of what characters looked like, and I just can’t get over the fact that Peeta was casted the way it was, because based on the descriptions from the book, the actor well didn’t represent what the real Peeta should look like. I also was expecting the book to go into far more details of the extravagant life at the Capitol, why it was all so colorful and crashing, and I didn’t feel the book did justice at explaining that, or perhaps the other way around, the movie took exaggerated liberties.
I will say as a tax payer it is nice that we will be able to utilize such services for free, and we still do not have to attend the public schools. If she didn't qualify, she still would need speech, and then we would have to wait forever, and then pay $40 a session at least twice a week or more. Free works for me.
If you have been around this blog for any length of time you probably remember me mentioning one of the little ones residing at Eagles Nest named Victoria...
The cute girl in the photo with David is Sara Davies.
Lets me know everything's all right
I have a precious Valentine's Day tutorial in my head. It has been swimming around in there since before Christmas. Isn't that remarkable? It is so simple and yet I have not carved out the time for it yet. I am hoping to do it this week so that it might actually be helpful to you before February 14th. Stay tuned!
Now, the track is the easy part since we already have the constraint and the quad. Bezier spline is one that I released in Degrafa. It’s a simple construction with G-1 continuity and a tension parameter. Additional artificial tangent control is provided by augmenting the spline with degenerate quad. segments at the beginning and end. The spline is non-interpolative.
Me: (rather confused, then looked at her) Well, what are you saving your money for?
“I love you, Martha, with all of my soul. I always have, and I always will.”
Theresa Breslin’s latest historical novel PRISONER OF THE INQUISITION has won the teenage section (12+) of The Historical Association, Young Quills Award, is shortlisted for the Scottish Children’s Book Award and was voted favourite book by the young people shadowing the Carnegie Medal Book Awards.
My flight was scheduled to leave at 10:35. Once we’re seated on the plane, the flight crew informs us that they have no jet fuel in Lisbon, and will have to fly to Porto to get fuel, but we will surely all make our connecting flights. So we sat on the tarmac for an hour before take off for no specific reason. But I had had that one mimosa, so I was feeling no pain. Then we make the one hour flight to Porto, where refueling takes an hour while we sat there, then we sat on the tarmac for more time – no explanation forthcoming. At which point I asked for water or food or something, because that mimosa had worn off. There was a lot of bitching at DH, but we got a 100 calorie bag of Sun Chips and some nuts. I hate junk food, but scarfed down those chips like you wouldn’t believe.
“Okay Jessenia. Did I say that right?”
The gospel says our good deeds pale in comparison to the depravity of our sin: offensive!
The Singaporean customer then asked for the name of the PRC sales assistant and when he refused to answer him, the customer raised his voice at him in public:
I suspect he shortly thereafter had a bath in the tub.
9. Constantines - Shower of Stones
There are so many parts of blending a family that are challenging. I suppose among those are the worries that are somewhere along the lines of “what if his kids don’t like me?” Little did I know that those would actually be the more minor worries.
In the past week (where I have been woefully absent), the following things have happened:
That’s very hard to please
Seriously. Ryann is something else. She is so much fun. AND SO much trouble. Really I'd been writing this post in my head all morning, how adorable she is, some awesome things that she has done or said lately, etc etc. And then there was the 30 minutes before naptime that she just wouldn't do a damn thing I wanted, and she thought it was the funniest thing in the world.
The first eight tracks of these demos appear to have been recorded in the summer of 1984, when the band was a four piece (Mark Arm, Steve Turner, Jeff Ament and Alex Vincent) prior to the arrival of Stone Gossard. The tracks 33 RPM and Leech were released as a single on
how to efficiently and legally access teaching and research materials;
I'm a slow dying flower
I sat on the coffee shop couch, legs tucked underneath, sipping on my coffee.
Note that this is a “framework” to set a strategic discussion and cross functional understanding but not a complete product line analysis. This will set your baseline business understanding for subsequent analysis and recommendations. One of the challenges with this method is the interpretive and subjective nature of the steps – keep this in mind when creating the tools.
The Daring Baker’s October 2011 challenge was Povitica, hosted by Jenni of The Gingered Whisk. Povitica is a traditional Eastern European Dessert Bread that is as lovely to look at as it is to eat!
But my heart still feels today,
10 - 2pm
complete a Case
I suppose if I were still married that would be easier to swallow. Instead, I wonder. Does Son talk to Dad? Would he rather be with Dad than me? Does he complain to Dad about me the way Daughter complains to me about Dad? The secret stalker in me is dying to know.
1/3 c frozen peas
“Oh we’re closer than you think dude!”, the wierd guy said with that same silly smile he had every time he made a smart-ass comment to me.
I paper pieced his little uniform - the white part is just the cardstock, but with the shading around the edges it makes it look like I found some magic white marker to colour with - but no - just a colouring technique!
We love seeing how our clients use their custom LH Calligraphy products - feel free to share your photos on our Facebook page!
“Our goal is to create a network of towns and cities throughout the country which are proud to be places of safety, and which include people seeking sanctuary fully in the life of their communities.”
Author Robert Spencer, founder of the major website Jihad Watch, recently published a book with the provocative title Did Muhammad Exist? An Inquiry into Islam’s Obscure Origins.
04. Flowing Tears – Razorbliss
the mind that woke in them.
My heart is so full of stories that I am not sure where to begin, but perhaps with this: I want to give glory to God! Amen?
I just tied the scarf around my waist. Hopefully you remember this is one of the scarfs I picked up at the Salvation army.
That’s the point, Marino was a great Hall of Fame QB and he had a low test score. The top cornerback of the 2011 draft, Patrick Peterson (also from LSU), scored a 9 on the test and was still drafted fifth overall by the Arizona Cardinals and had a hell of a rookie year. WR A.J. Green scored a 10 on the test and ended up a first-round pick and had a great rookie year. Other low-score testers were Percy Harvin (14) and Hakeem Nick (11). Claiborne wasn’t the first to score low on the test, and unfortunately, will not be the last.
After I worked for AC, I worked for a few other content mills here and there. I did a stint with Bright Hub as a contributing editor--and while payments were slightly higher than AC, it was just another babystep for me, building my writing portfolio a little more. When Bright Hub decided to ask its writers to do more work than I thought was fair for the amount they were paying, I dropped the account.
It's coming.
I looked into the most amazing, serene, beautiful eyes of my new baby boy, born at home. The first thing I said after he was born? "Hello, sweetness." Then, "That wasn't so bad!" It really wasn't.
Winning
When we first moved we were sure we'd just be able to rent a simple, fully furnished apartment. This was not the case. Having to deal with brokers and meet landlords and be accepted in to the city was so full-on. In the end it was so worth it and the funny things that we went through along the way really changed us and made us be able to cope with anything life throws us today.
Inspite of hist discomfort we have spent the majority of the day snuggled on the couch watching quiet movies, watching children sled down the hill outside the window, and watching the flurries erase the evidence of their fun.
made some hearts out of it
Roger Kimball - editor/publisher of The New Criterion – recently penned an article for The Weekly Standard on the fate of the Great American Novel (GAM). His diagnosis? Critical condition!
And again, it's FREE today (1 May 2012).
Fresh Fruit or Veggies Piled in a Colander or Bowl
Sewing tips: This Pinterest board already has some great content! I also found some things I had saved previously in my sewing desk, so I popped them in my folder instead. Gotta love having everything in one place!
Very unnerving twist on something so familiar and cute. It’s midsummer in the woods, and of course, the teddy bears must have their picnic. But pagan-esque rites make monsters out of children’s loyal friends. This is definitely the stuffing of nightmares.
It’s May already, and I am going to live in the moment. Whether it is simply enjoying my morning cup of coffee in silence at work, or just the few minutes I have alone in the car, I will realise that this moment I will let go of worries, and just be. I suggest you do the same and hopefully, we can stretch these “moments” long enough to become our life.
Cue Twilight Zone theme.
Nope, he didn’t finish the sentence. He would starve to death. After all, that’s why I had called to start with. I gave Goliath about two doses of probiotics, and it was a miracle. His diarrhea ended. All that food that was pouring through him started sticking. He gained weight. He grew. He became huge!
‘Krútt’ now shows every sign of becoming another of those labels that progressive artists everywhere loathe; it is even being embraced as a style term, self-consciously mixing woolen socks and designer clothing. But you can be sure that few serious artists will accept such a fascicle definition. Even cute babies will bite when provoked.
It is important for the public to understand that reactors that have been operating for decades, such as those at the Fukushima-DaiIchi site have generated some of the largest concentrations of radioactivity on the planet.
several leaves kale
In the end, I felted around a circular resist...
“Good afternoon!” She chirped, “How’s the sail holding up?”
I realized that this was the best I was going to feel for quite awhile so I grabbed some water and dried fruit to munch on while I sat at the computer and caught up on my blog reading. Every few minutes pausing to relax through a contraction.
For those that believe that the fences are the problem, personally I think not.
The Save Power Kit is an innovative resource to help engage people in energy efficiency behaviours.
images its words created. A new, different place. Something so far apart from my/the ordinary world. Somewhere to escape to. Somewhere that filled me with wonder. Somewhere that was mine and mine alone. To me, that's freedom, and is what makes MG so special. Yes, there are emotions, high and lows, in MG, but none of the YA angst. The MG books I love to read, and try to write, still
Fill one pie crust with the apples, pour the cooled cranberry jalapeno mixture over them, and top the whole thing with another pie crust. Crimp the edges to seal it and cut some vent holes. “Mine is a complete mess and it keeps falling apart! I followed your instructions exactly. What the hell?” This is obviously a case of user error. Did you place the first pie crust in a pie pan? “No, you didn’t tell me to.” Holy shit. Do you need me to hold your fucking hand and explain every little detail to you while we make this pie? “It couldn’t hurt.” Oh yes it could.
The flag hanging on our house is the flag my mother-in-law was given at my father-in-law's funeral. I didn't know them and had not met their son yet, but I am close to my brother-in-law and sister-in-law and enjoy hearing their family stories and seeing their family pictures. My father-in-law was in the Coast Guard.
Jared: I don't know.
“Let me boost you up, Dani.”
If someone likes you, they are more willing to go the extra mile for you. This is where your people skills are useful because your doctor will respond to you more positively if you are friendly. That isn’t always easy if you aren’t feeling well, but I’ve heard from many doctors that a patient who is angry, bitter, belligerent or has a bad attitude is not well liked. Being a likeable patient is being a smart patient.
In Nepal, the placenta is given the name ‘bucha-co-satthi’ – meaning ‘baby’s friend’
Many, many people died in their struggle for a better world,we must never forget, no pasaran, another world is not only possible it is inevitable, we must remain in solidarity with all those who believe in freedom, and social justice.
Curators at the Hermitage only make 5,000 Rubles a month, or about $200. Which makes one wonder how much the son, Nicholai was making when he quite working there two years ago on account of poor wages. The art stolen, 221 objects in all, is estimated to be valued at between $5M - $100M (the low end is the “official estimate” the high, is from art historians) In any case, even the low end is still twenty-five thousand months’ salary.
children lived with her, says the orchard hill
Tomorrow's inspiration post will feature the lovely layout ladies of the Lawn Fawn DT, so I will be taking the night off. I will be back after that with a card featuring a cute new mini stamp set! Have a great day! ♥♥♥
“Going for a swim!” said John, smiling boyishly.
All my thoughts converge and hover above me, but for now Shiloh lulls me with the gentle ocean waves and the sound of rain. It might be 9am by now. It might be later. Coffee can wait, the plans for the day can wait. For now my eyes are closing, JW lies beside me, his steady breath a familiar comfort. And I am savouring the moment.
Master bathroom after. Cute accessories make all the difference.
Join former U.S. Congressman Brian Baird for a lively discussion and an inside look at informing and influencing science and policy decisions.
One of Rickey’s friends had a young adult son who was struggling with addiction to “bath salts”, the same hideous psychosis-producing drug that almost killed Rickey. They prayed for the son together, and Rickey had a chance to share his story with him. A couple weeks later, Rickey heard through his friend that his son had come home and told his dad: “I got saved, dad!” He had been by himself and just prayed that God would take away his addiction, forgive his sins, and give him a new life. His father was overwhelmed with joy and thanksgiving. Rickey did not know whether his story, testimony, or his prayer for the young man had anything to do with him coming to Christ; what Rickey DID know is that his responsibility was to continue to tell his own story to people around him. The Gospel was a seed that had found good soil in Rickey, and good seed does not produce just food, it produces seed that multiplies.
Did you know that instead of taking the time to roast a head or two of garlic in the oven, you can "roast" it in the microwave? Depending on the wattage of your microwave, you can do it in less than 5 minutes!!
-2 tbsp cumin
SNACK and DRINK
This little yellow weed was our dinner the other night. I was almost out of romaine, so I went out back and picked some dandelion leaves. I also found a recipe for dandelion fritters. It’s just the flower part battered and fried. Let me tell you, from just the unmown strip between the yard and the field, I’ve got months worth of dinners!
If you're wondering where I am...I'm up to my neck in receipts and mileage diaries, doing taxes. I had hoped to be doing posts on whiskey this week, leading up to WhiskyFest Chicago, but as usual, poor planning has put me at the Windy Corner of Taxes.
( I am curious to know what is the feeling that passes through me. I wonder what I can do to express my boundaries to her and feel different ).
When I was a child with a family dog it was drummed into me that I shroud never feed chicken bones to animals because of the possibility of them splintering and causing injury. Now I'm not suggesting that health and safety approach, but I do think that you can strip a chicken of its edible meat without resorting to such vicious chopping. Please.
This degeneration, in a disposable age
Yesterday night I managed to do my Exerbeat work out and weirdly it felt easier than usual. I think I am getting stronger and fitter! Actually today I have done my weight lifting and upgraded all the exercise from 5 pounds to 8 pounds. I didn’t do as many because it was harder to do. Now I feel like I guess I needed those 5 pounds weights but I feel like I didn’t use them very long. I think I will use them both in one hand and do one arm after another when I will upgraded to 10 pounds. That way I won’t need to buy another set.
English Pronunciation by G. Nolst Trenité
And here is the Fulford clone they tried to covince people today is the real deal, with short hair, along with the Rothschild/Putin agent Alexander Romonov, self-proclaimed nephew of Queen Elizabeth and true heir of the Russian throne…
Soy sauce (1/3 cup)
The pattern is one I wrote back in 2006; it’s hard to believe it’s been THAT long!
Sad sigh. Off to drink my grimy glass of window wine,
There’s two young kids playing “match me”. I’m trying to figure out who the fuck did I screw over to draw shit duty.
The American Jewish organizations that seem so opposed to white American nationhood, that so strongly promote the idea of the United States as a proposition nation - an error even the generally fair Slezkine falls into - link this argument to the Jewish experience under Nazism. Granted, the link is more often left unsaid than openly stated, but the designation by groups like the ADL of anti-immigration sentiment as "hate" makes the connection clear. The current "show me your papers" trope, used by pro-immigration forces, also less than subtly tars white Americans, the majority of whom want immigration laws enforced, as crypto-Nazis.
Rustick Tavern
“So what made you change your mind? Why?”
Check again.
An Imperfect Offering is Orbinski’s deeply personal tale of the struggle between self-preservation and outreach, and how he manages to find both. His story spurs us to find our courage and let it live.
Next we had the pleasure of seeing Rupert Murdoch and his son James appear last week before the Department of Culture, Media and Sport Select Committee of the House of Commons to answer questions about the phone hacking scandal. Here again the weakness of the questioning system may have allowed wilful errors, if there were any, by the Murdochs to go unpunished. I should say, as a preliminary point, that they were not placed on oath, but “Erkine May” the bible of Parliamentary procedure makes it clear that lying to or misleading Parliament can amount to a contempt of Parliament, which is punishable by Parliament.
I just realized after posting that my center image is a little off. Doesn't it just kill you when you notice something after posting! I was sitting here wondering why the sentiment looked a little crooked. Oh well, not taking it apart now. Aaargh!
I think I’ll go ahead with the blatant plagiarism and keep the ball rolling in that direction.
Each of us has come to this Earth with a mission from on high. Our talents and interests give us clues as to what that mission may be. Fervent prayer and a sincere desire to know what our Heavenly Father would have us accomplish with our lives will help us to more finely tune our course so as to line up our actions with His will. If we are busily engaged in the work of the Creator of this world, the Creator of our mortal shells, does it matter what friend, family member, neighbor or stranger thinks of us?
How was the first week of your New Year?
PARENTS of adults with severe learning difficulties are facing college bills of nearly £5,000 after funding was slashed by the government.
The sector continues to be hampered by the anemic pace of improvement in the labor market. There is certainly positive churn in leasing, but rents remain at levels last seen in 2007, and five-year leases coming due in 2012 run the risk of being signed at equivalent or lower rent levels, exerting a dilutive effect on landlord incomes.”
I sewed 'em up...
The Biker pulled over. The car in the ditch was bent in such a way that the rear tires were actually higher than the roof, and the roof was smashed backward by the impact. The Biker reached through the window and held the man upright because he was drowning in his own blood. It took a rescue team and lots of equipment to cut the car from around the man. He was alive and in a lot of pain when they took him away in the ambulance.
I can feel my smile.
Looking forward to seeing all that bling and glam peeps.
By the way, for no very good reason, the photo is of my left foot. I had to run in the airport today to make my connection, in those shoes, with my bags, and it just seemed to kind of epitomize my day.
Scripts: Okay, so what do you say to people making the opposite claim: “My family tree is riddled with high blood pressure – it’s my genetic destiny. There’s nothing I can do to avoid it, so why bother?”
I ponder the contrast of the solemnity of Christ’s suffering paraded around town with this display of economic well-being, the full bars and restaurants, the festive atmosphere parading on the street corners.
I used photos of Brayden playing ball, plenty of circles, "action" lines behind the ball up top and an arrow to move you across the page. Plus I got the extra credit "team" in there. Then I just had a blast with my white pen, adding lines here and there to highlight things and move the eye around the lo, and my latest favorite of ball stitches around the edge of the layout.
Pairing other flavors with Fernet can also create problems, however. One of the most popular ways to drink it is, actually, neat, with a ginger beer back, though many of its adherents will opt for a lager. Ginger and Fernet go wonderfully well together. Because of this, I thought that a nice spicy ginger flavor would add an interesting element to the I.B.F.
The process of expansion into higher consciousness requires that we honor universal principles as well as the natural environment, and thus allow ourselves to be guided by them. Achieving this is an enormous step, for when we are truly in harmony with these things; we are able to express the authentic essence of who it is that we are as spiritual beings — thus becoming one with all of life.
Power Calculation
I really love mornings. My morning routine has helped me to love mornings even more because it gives me a good jump start to my day. This is another one I have to give credit to Flylady. I have had a morning routine for over 15 years and it has been adjusted and tweaked to the different seasons of life the Lord has me in but it has been a constant part of my day for a long time - which means it has become a habit. I have a list in my homemaking binder (post to come later on this one) that doesn't need referred to very often because it has been ingrained in me.
And appetites both carnal and culinary.
Our one true father Satan !
"Somethin' cold n' wet," I replied.
Let me start out by saying, I am so thankful for all the comments and congratulations yesterday! You guys are all so nice and I am so excited to tell you all about it!
In walks the idea of generosity.
when clothes create an alluring silhouette
Now I just had to wait. I clenched my jaw against another yawn. Thirty minutes was nothing compared to the year I’d already waited to see Dad again. My hands clutched the lion heads at the ends of the armrests. This would be easy.
Not content with being offensive about a young law student who almost certainly got his training contract in a ‘magic circle firm’ by hard work and having the right qualifications – rather than his ability to tweet – Aldridge runs ‘amok’ with the suggestion (as I interpreted it) that Felicity Gerry and John Cooper QC are propping up their careers in a difficult criminal law market by tweeting. ["Gerry and Cooper are both criminal barristers at a time when legal aid funding is about to be cut by a third."].
I actually rather like the idea, if that indeed is a “trend” going forward. I mean, it would have been great to have had Atlanta’s Olympic stadium/track preserved and the facility used to host say, the 1999 World Championships – no offense to Seville. It would have given the U.S. it’s first hosting of the global track championships, AND it would have provided us with a much needed track and field facility to use for other events such as Olympic Trials; NCAA Championships; another bid for a World Championships; and perhaps another Diamond League or Euro Circuit meet! All of which would have come “free of charge” via the Olympic construction of the site. Instead here we sit with nothing left from the construction of Atlanta save our memories of the event – and Centennial Olympic Park – nice, but not much of an athletics legacy from the world’s greatest athletic event.
I have to ask what kind of clotting disorder you have. I was diagnosed with a pulmonary embolism in February and they discovered that I have Protien S Deficency.
Luke 10:32 Levite came and looked and passed on the other side
2-1 Ryan Hurst, (smashed in the loose ball from a corner).
Here are the winning entries again for your viewing pleasure:
It's been a crazy day...let's just face it...I am a procrastinator...
Falconer's IPA: An aggressively bitter -hopped IPA of the 'old school.' Folks who love the So Cal IPA style would probably love this one, for me, though I liked and enjoyed it, it missed the aromatic sweet spot and was a bit too caustic.
We looked at our water collection trough and had enough to nearly fill 2 water bottles – we were quite pleased! After filtering the water and breaking camp we were on our way again, this time to Bee Island Campsite. It was a beautiful hike, the breeze and overcast sky made the hike quite comfortable! As we hiked through the open prairie we still found no surface water, the drought was hitting very hard in this part of Florida. We crossed Powerline Road and dropped out packs for a bit to explore the surrounding area. There were the remains of a small watering hole with very stagnant water, lots of wild flowers and a wonderful breeze. It was a great place to rest up a bit before the final 3-4 miles we still had to travel that day.
I just learned how to make this adorable vintage flower. It's made from white sheen curtain I purchased at Walmart for $4.50. My local fabric store is not that local and Walmart didn't have sheen fabric.
From today's paper (a quote from Obama about Bush, a Medal of Honor winner):
Community Benefits Districts are formed by the additional taxation of local businesses and property owners in a San Francisco neighborhood. Even with a $7 billion budget, the City and County of San Francisco somehow can't provide such public amenities as basic beat policing, help for tourists, and graffiti removal. Last week I ran into my first "community ambassador" above, and after it was established that I actually live in the mini-district, he asked if there was anything he could do for me.
Dusan Stojanovic and Jovana Gec in Belgrade, Serbia, Slobodan Lekic in Brussels and Nebi Qena in Athens contributed to this report.
Time spent: 2 hrs.
It is very rare that we prepare food for only one meal at a time. Last week we grilled steaks (a gift from my mom) for an evening meal. Monday night I sliced the leftover steaks and we ate them on top of or as a side to our salads from the garden. We cooked way too much food for our gathering Saturday night, so we were able to take a good bit of it with us as our contribution to a meal with friends on Sunday night and shared some as well with a single young man. There was still enough for another meal of the grilled chicken, but we were a little tired of it so, into the freezer it went for a meal next week.
At a fashion shoot, company executives Owen Baxter and Geoffrey Lewis ran into a stylist from New York who stunned them with the news that the classic Hush Puppies had suddenly become hip in the clubs and bars of Downtown Manhattan. Concurrently Baxter says kids were raiding resale shops in The Village in Soho. People were going to Ma and Pa stores where the shoes were still being carried buying them up at a frantic pace. Baxter and Lewis were in disbelief. It made no sense that an out of fashion product in decline was suddenly” the rage” in New York. They were also told that Isaac Mizrahi was wearing the shoes himself. Baxter and Lewis didn’t know who Isaac Mizrahi was….Things begin to happen in a blur of sequence: designer John Bartlett called wanting to use Hush Puppies for his spring collection. The Manhattan designer Anna Sui wanted shoes for her show, while across the country in Los Angeles, Joel Fitzgerald put a 25 foot inflatable Basset Hound (The Hush Puppy Mascot) atop his store. While he was gutting an adjoining art gallery, turning it into a Hush Puppies Store, Pee Wee Herman dropped in to buy a pair. “It was total word of mouth” said Fitzgerald.
Context on the show: Mr. Burns’ pompous, bloated biopic is booed out of contention at the Springfield film festival. Smithers consoles him by telling him, “Uh, no, they’re saying ‘Boo-urns! Boo-urns!’” prompting Burns to ask the crowd if they were saying “boo” or “boo-urns”. The geriatric Hans Moleman is alone in picking the latter.
This divorce from the physical is what stands behind the splitting and flattening of our personalities. But it is distinct from the two previous problems in this way: it is anti-Church. The Church is the physical people of God gathered together, unified, and led by the Spirit of Jesus Christ. It is within the context of our physical churches that we grow in Christlikeness, where we grow to learn about Jesus, where we must practice practical forgiveness, practical love, practical suffering, and all the practical aspects of our Christian life. Christianity—following Christ—is nothing if not a set of practical relationships lived in space and time with other people. The online environment, in removing the physical body, removes the primary field where we practice our faith.
I guess our card to you would merely say "Thanks ". There are lots of sentiments where a single word can say it all... Enjoy, Welcome, Peace, Joy, Birthday, Sympathy, Love, Thanks etc..
7They make noises like asses among the brushwood; they get together under the thorns.
That dossier ‘made the case for war’ in Britain, but it has since been disproved and has been criticised as dishonest.
What was our reaction?
to have sex the way conservatives want them to
Why would track and field want to LIMIT the ways in which athletes are able to earn income? Especially given that it has NOT developed a system whereby it can provide “salaries” to its athletes? If those running the sport can’t guarantee the athletes income, what right does it have to limit their earning potential such that it does NOT inhibit the sport itself – especially when a successful model (Individual Sponsorships) has already been provided?
88. The Feeling-Together We Were Made: Double Album Edition (Universal)
Netizens were glad to see that Hyomin was showing her support for fellow member Jiyeon and wrote, “Hyomin is awesome!”, “I applaud Hyomin!”, and “T-ara fighting!”
-- @johnmoe
4-Full Self Expression
Paul’s intent for writing this letter is not to shame or offend this people,
Me: I could see HR cringe as they flipped him off.
Are there other things that should never be said? Let us know.
I know I haven't been blogging much... I'm teaching a magnet making class tonight so I've been in prep mode getting ready for that: Purchasing, flattening bottlecaps, printing and punching out designs, bagging up kits in little baggies. Lots of busy work for me but hopefully it will make everything tonight go more smoothly. Anyway.....
Writer/Director Kasdan also wrote “Raiders of the Lost Ark“, “The Empire Strikes Back“, and “Return of the Jedi“, among many others.
Watch any body builder lift a weight, drop it to its original position, and then lift it again. You’ll see him exhale, always in the exertion of lifting, and inhale in the relax of the drop. On a physiological level, the man must inhale so he can exhale. But there’s also a special property of exhalation in that it tightens the muscles and prepares them to be used. At the heart level, the man relaxes and grounds himself in the humbling security of each drop, but expresses that confidence in the reaching forward of the lift. Each side must give to the other and the more it gives the greater amount it can receive in return only to give it back again. The relationship between the two creates a forward momentum that is simply beautiful because of its sacrificial nature.
Easter is one of the most joyous celebrations in the Christian calendar, marking the crucifixion and resurrection of Jesus Christ.
One of the possible conclusions from this experience could be:
Here’s the kinds of books we’re looking out for:
This question is kind of hard for me! I really don't look to certain people for style inspiration. I find it more in the clothes themselves. When I was growing up though, I thought Betsey Johnson was the coolest person in the world. She was unapologetically off-the- wall and has been doing brights, prints, and neons since day one. I've always been more drawn to funky/quirky style than classic looks. As I've gotten older, I've become a little more "buttoned up" and find myself dressing slightly more conservatively. I think Meredith Melling Burke is the perfect mix of
Bridgette Guerzon Mills I think the most important thing I have learned is that I cannot wait for inspiration to hit. I have to just come to the table/easel and just work. The more I work, the easier it gets to get into the groove. Writing in a journal really helps me to hone in on what is going on inside of me, which is what ends up on the canvas. I have been using visual journal entries at the beginning of a studio session to loosen up and help me get going. I just throw some color down, glue a few images or scraps of this and that, and then write about whatever is going on in my head or write about my goals for that day. I have developed these quick thrown together compositions into larger paintings. I have also found color combinations through those entries that I may not have tried otherwise. I highly recommend this practice.
Hello everyone. To those of us who are still in school… ONE MORE WEEK! We can do it… most likely.
The kids decided a few weeks before Christmas that they were going to do a play for us on Christmas Eve. So, they spent their free time writing, typing, and rehearsing. Isaac played the part of Santa.
Well, the price tag of the Traverse and every other SUV made my eyes bulge. Most start at $30,000! Factor in the fact that this was an unexpected car purchase, so our purse strings were crying- NO! NO! NO!.
Advertising company Interpublic Group (IPG) today announced that it has reached an agreement to sell approximately half of its holdings in Facebook for net cash proceeds of $133 million in a privately negotiated transaction. IPG did not reveal the buyer, the number of shares it would sell, or the price paid per share, but said it will record a pre-tax gain of $132 million upon closing of the sale.
A howling wind blows the litter as the rain flows,
Stamps: Mix 'n Match Sentiments; Friends (Scrapmaster's Paradise)
Here's a game you can play the next time you're
Read here, and try to curb your excessive spending habits, please!
First my picks from the preview -
Jami: Well, we wanted the baby - that baby. It was so weird being pregnant and happy one day and then not being pregnant the next. Even months later I'd find myself driving to the library or store and think, "I was just pregnant and now I'm not. How is that?" It's hard to let go of something you held inside of you and wanted so much. It's been even harder not being able to get pregnant again. I've had to let go of the dream of more children. It feels like many deaths instead of just one.
that goes with it
14. (C) When the Senator asked about China’s growing ties and influence in Africa, the Prime Minister said, "Ninety percent of China’s relations in the region are business-related." He remarked that China offered cheap and adequate alternatives for poor countries needing technology and infrastructure. China also offered generous credit terms — including $2 billion for Ethiopian public enterprises alone in the last six months. China was also the fastest growing market for Ethiopian exports. Meles said China was seen by many African leaders as "less meddlesome" than Western partners, and more predictable in its support. He argued that China’s help was not completely unconditional, however, as had recently been evident in Sudan/Darfur. The PM also noted that the visit to China recently made by many African heads of state had been an expression of appreciation for China’s role, but added that most serious African leaders recognized that increasing ties with China should not be done at the expense of relations with Europe, the U.S. and emerging powers like Brazil and India. The Chinese had their own agenda and interests and might not be so flexible and generous if they became the only option for African governments.
Shell/cover for both omni and echo are $21.95 right now, and the omni is on sale for $18.95
and three cards I already put into binders and didn't scan. Oops.
I have fond memories of my mother-in-law, Lynn, who sadly passed away while I was expecting her second grandchild. I used to call her at least once a week, more often while she was sick and going through chemo. One of the things we always talked about were books. She asked me if I had read The Da Vinci Code and what I had thought about it. I went right out and purchased it and was hooked. Sensationalistic or not, Dan Brown’s writing is gripping, adventurous, and laced with detail. I especially liked how well he described Paris and London. My mind’s eye revisited every location and raced alongside Sophie and Robert on their modern-day quest.
In my freshman year of college, I had no television. I would beg my downstairs friends to let me use their tv once a week, so I could watch House in real time, not the next day when it came online. Once, the boys were late and I couldn’t get into their room. I’ll admit, I may have been overreacting, but I believe I came close to tears.
Giving them the money, doing what they say, all that may work but there is no guarantee. If you have never read Jeff Cooper's book The Principles of Personal Defense. I suggest you order a copy immediately. It is a short book but summarizes a lot of important things.
But there are two inescapables in all this.
Which brings us to the new element. Something has happened in the 30+ years since the first Muppet film. Children’s films (to say nothing of most Hollywood films and ALL of American culture) have become, to quote Segal’s character in the film “hard” and “cynical”. This is parodied in The Muppets in the form of a reality game show called “Punch Teacher” where children have the opportunity to deck their humiliated teachers, who are trapped in stocks. The Muppets find themselves marginalized while this kind of programming holds sway. The rub is, somehow we all agree that it’s deplorable, but somehow most of us are contributing in one way or another to this cultural catastrophe. Except when we make the choice NOT to do so. For this reason, and a hundred others, I found this movie (like the original Muppet Show) totally inspirational.
Khadaf’s got a nurse
2) Ah, the ole “out of Africa” hypothesis.
Jeremy has a challenge for someone who isn’t a wrestler, but has been the biggest prick in 3 years. Borash has seniority over every single employee in TNA, yet he is being disrespected by Bischoff for so long. Bischoff had a bit of a Twitter war with him awhile back, and JB has finally had enough. So here comes Bischoff, and he wants a match.
Hearing and seeing this might make people think Putin is on the side of good, but it’s all a scripted drama. It is a Trojan Horse — just when it seems like Putin and Co. are going to take down the Rothschilds/Rockefeller Crime organization, the horse will smash open and the invaders will attack from within.
I breezed through this book. It’s a fun and entertaining book to read and while its not life changing, poignant or powerful--what it does have is a great premise that will get you thinking about what you would do in the same situation.
Blog-checking lines: Our May hostess, Denise, of There’s a Newf in My Soup!, challenged The Daring Cooks to make Gumbo! She provided us with all the recipes we’d need, from creole spices, homemade stock, and Louisiana white rice, to Drew’s Chicken & Smoked Sausage Gumbo and Seafood Gumbo from My New Orleans: The Cookbook, by John Besh.
The winner will be chosen by Random drawing from all valid entries submitted. The winner will be notified via email and will have up to 48 hours to contact me with their mailing address before another winner is chosen. This giveaway is open to U.S. residents only. No P.O Boxes please.
Action mystery fans and those who like a little fright in their stories will enjoy these.
They ARE two separate offences. Accepting, or even asking for a bribe, is an offence in itself, even if he then did nothing.
Désiré (France…Sacha Guitry)
In medieval times up through the Victorian era, people were quite aware of the passage of time and of mortality. People frequently had a memento mori (a Latin phrase meaning “remember your mortality”) such as a skull or an hourglass with the phrase tempis fugit (time flies). These were Christian motifs which existed not to remind people to appreciate Earthly pleasures but, quite, the opposite, to remind them that their Earthly life was of no import given what was waiting for them beyond. I am not a Christian or a believer but I did buy an hourglass memento mori to remind me that the world and small moments are of such value that we should treasure them. (This, I’m sure, would be blasphemous to the originators of these objects and pieces of art.)
The leader of the United Democratic Movement, Bantu Holomisa, urged the Safety and Security Ministry to immediately suspend Selebi pending the outcome of a decision by Ngcuka.
50g butter
I constructed that one for an Art Journal round-robin
But here I will share the self-forgiveness which may assist anyone who experiences this.
Getting time in the shower can be tough for at-home parents. Obviously, when you are a parent who works elsewhere, it’s in everybody’s best interest that when you arrive at the office your teeth are brushed and your body clean. But for those of us who don’t *have* to make ourselves presentable first thing in the morning, getting bathroom time quickly falls on the morning to-do list. Plus, especially if you have a baby or toddler, chances are your efforts will be rendered meaningless after a bout of spit-up or a scrambled-egg food fight.
So trying to make first chair is much more difficult than I realized. Buck, how do you deal with the guys from Pennsyltucky? Burn their tents or tell them there’s fresh woodchuck in the lodge? So no I didn’t get the first chair, but was on maybe the 6th and it didn’t seem like anyone ahead was going to be so fast. From the chair it all looked like flat corduroy, so I chose Hellgate Racer’s as 1st choice. Sweetness all the way. First to bottom and chose Cliff Racer’s second run , SWEETER. Now that’s how it should always be. And guess what? The sky was blue and the sun was shinning. Made the circuit off the top hitting everything before doing multiples on Cliff Racer’s. Even hit lower K which had improved since last week, just not enough. There were those damn statues at the bottom of the Cliff!
PS my spell check seems to not want to work so disregard any crappyness!!
What follows is a review of the Oris Chronoris watch. With its livery of black, orange and steel the Chronoris has been designed to offer that ‘sporty look’ that is so fashionable today. But does the Chronoris watch by Oris stand up as a good sports watch?
What I paid: +€200 (two persons, lunch; see details below)
EXT. LONG BEACH - HARBOR - NIGHT - AT THAT MOMENT
2 pounds YELLOW farm fresh English cheddar cheese
And so did the fifty or so Ale Stars who greeted Shawn’s introduction with an almost (hate to even mention her name!) Oprah-like round of applause and just a smattering of hootin’ and a hollerin’. If you’d told me a few years back that Australian craft brewers would be welcomed to the stage as Rock Stars I would have laughed and suggested you buy me a beer by way of compensation but such is the marvellous nature of the scene here at the moment.
Electronic Frontier Foundation
Imagine. Worn out mamas like you and me, we are lights.
Joyce: That's just the circle-arrow thingy.
Due to tremendous growth, you now have the opportunity to join this established team that are already blitzing their targets on a monthly basis.
I will be in touch with you soon, to get your addresses for shipment. Also I want to thank all of you that have participated so far, by tweeting, liking, responding, and following these blogs. Remember, we will have another giveaway for the last blog on February 27 and the rules are still the same (check them out here). So keep those comments coming. We love to hearing your thoughts.
Congratulations to Beth and very well deserved! Now if someone can only knock off Diane Lockhart's wardrobe, I would be very happy.
Now when one whom you love is suffering, and you can do nothing for him, you turn to prayer, hoping that some miracle will happen to alleviate his sorrow; but if you once understand that the suffering is caused by the ignorance created by that person himself, then you will realize that you can give him sympathy and affection, but you cannot remove his suffering.
For one day, everyone can join the Mexican (Latino) family.
THEOSOPHIST. So much the worse for law, as it has been led, through such a lack of discrimination, into committing more than one judiciary mistake and crime. It is the term alone that frightens you with its “superstitious” ring in it. Would not law punish an abuse of hypnotic powers, as I just mentioned? Nay, it has so punished it already in France and Germany; yet it would indignantly deny that it applied punishment to a crime of evident sorcery. You cannot believe in the efficacy and reality of the powers of suggestion by physicians and mesmerisers (or hypnotisers), and then refuse to believe in the same powers when used for evil motives. And if you do, then you believe in Sorcery. You cannot believe in good and disbelieve in evil, accept genuine money and refuse to credit such a thing as false coin. Nothing can exist without its contrast, and no day, no light, no good could have any representation as such in your consciousness, were there no night, darkness nor evil to offset and contrast them.
Some of you share the same passion for postcards and have told me your interests...
The episteme described by Foucault, in my opinion, has suppressed the ability to think critically. To live without the structure that was created over the past few centuries would take a shift of consciousness on a grand scale. I believe that a change will happen but rather than it occurring from the top of the hierarchical pyramid down, it will happen from the bottom up and in small incremental steps. Observations, evaluations, and normalizing judgments are still a part of the construct but they have begun to change. Critical thinking requires observation of self, others, and context. We are witnessing a shift from the adversarial model to mediation, from being given the answer to being responsible for finding your own answer, from power over to empowerment. We are learning to think. Perhaps self-discipline makes individuals!
When we got home I decided this was a perfect opportunity to sit by the window and read a book. But all too soon there wasn’t enough light left so I gave up.
Lately, she is passionate about manga and anime. This has led her to learn a surprising (to me) amount of Japanese, study mythology, take up drawing, write stories, and so much more.
“Most of these stories are on the tragic side. But the reader must not suppose that the incidents I have narrated were of common occurrence. The vast majority of these people, government servants, planters, and traders, who spent their working lives in Malaya were ordinary people ordinarily satisfied with their station in life. They did the jobs they were paid to do more or less competently,. They were as happy with their wives as are most married couples. They led humdrum lives and did very much the same things every day. Sometimes by way of a change they got a little shooting; but at a rule, after they had done their day’s work, they played tennis if there were people to play with, went to the club at sundown if there was a club in the vicinity, drank in moderation, and played bridge. They had their little tiffs, their little jealousies, their little flirtations, their little celebrations. They were good, decent, normal people.
This sequence includes a moment that nobody who
The term was made up by people writing StarTrek fanfiction, to describe the author-insert characters (often given names like Mary Sue) who would show up in pieces of fanfiction as a new ensign or science officer and immediately prove to be the best looking, most intelligent, spunkiest, wittiest and most perfect StarFleet officer ever recruited. All the other characters would immediately realise this and hail Ensign Mary-Sue as a genius. If they did not, they were very obviously motivated by spite and jealousy, since Mary-Sue was so clearly perfect (and modest! And humble! And unaware of how beautiful she was!) that no one who wasn't wicked could do anything but embrace her.
22 Forever Young (Bob Dylan cover)
We never get to say.
My husband gave me Martha Stewart's cookie cookbook for Christmas last year (a not-so-subtle hint!), so I've got a lot of recipes to try, but I'd love to know your favourites...
John talked to Saylor about it later that day and told him some really beautiful things that made Saylor smile. He also said some really nice things to me that made me smile. That John is pretty damn out of this world.
‘I had a dream,’ she hissed. Her eyes flickered to the tree that had broken her, that had destroyed her physical being, and she felt renewed. I can be more, she thought feverishly, I can choose to have more than just enough.
a padlock catches
With remarkable prescience, philosopher Sun Tzu crafted the piercing words above more than 2,500 years ago. His statement emphasised the advent of strategic tools that could potentially be used to defeat an opponent without actually fighting that opponent on the battlefield.
Jeeragam (Cumin seeds) - 1/2 teaspoon
I cried in church. I’m a church-crier, it’s true. I feel like I’ve shared this little nugget on “Drama Happens” once before but I’ll share it again. I realize I’m quite the obnoxious over-sharer and but this specific confession really brings everyone’s judgy-eyes out. “You cry in church? But… why?!!?!?” It is weird. I tend to cry at about 90% of the sermons I hear and I don’t even know why! I guess it’s triggered by a sweet personal story, or a quote or phrase that makes me think, or when something reminds me of one the relationships in my life. Whatever the reason, if I feel intense emotion (good or bad) my eyes start to fill up. I’ve gotten quite good at blinking the tears away or letting them pool until I can get a good swipe of my hand up to my face to wipe them away all at once. Still, it gets tricky. And it’s just a very public place in a very quiet room and suddenly I feel like all eyes are on me and public display of emotion. If anything, it gives the Scottish more comedic material. Aren’t I the nicest?
-Tweet about this giveaway and comment telling me you did
Study the person’s background thoroughly and distill what you would like to learn to a few specific questions. Then send a handwritten note, call or approach the person directly to state your case. Explain why you admire the person, what type of advice you are seeking and how much time you would like. Example: “I’ve heard many times from other people how you turned around a struggling department. As a new manager I am having difficulty getting my team to work together. I’d love to take you to lunch next week to discuss my plan and get your advice for fine-tuning it.”
“They have rum?” It came out more like a question, then a statement.
But anyway, catching up, here's what went on in the field those few weeks ago.
There you have the first 11 chapters of my novel, tentatively titled “Where the Weird Things Are.” It is very awesome to see it all out on paper like that. All 33k words, single spaced, one-sided. That roughly came out to 80 pages. But man, something about seeing all those words on paper really made me feel good. Accomplished even.
as the train announcements make you stir
Based on what has been considered above, then it seems very unlikely that the UKSC would grant special leave, let alone grant an appeal.
Kitty Thomas writes dark literary fiction that explores power dynamics and sexuality (back in the olden days people called it erotica). This work is fiction and meant for an adult audience. The author does not endorse or condone any of the behavior carried out by characters in her stories.
Anyway back to the Tories and their emergence as a force by default, they have secured a bigger foothold in town halls despite a slump in the party's voting share and number of councillors.
This time the challenge is : make a Center Step Card.
Bancs publics -45
when danger lurks
I also know that our prayers and intention are very powerful. I am asking others to take a few minutes to send prayers/light/or intention for resolution to the polar bears.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to desire to be dominated because it makes me feel good, not realizing that it requires another to desire to dominate, which is often the case with rapists or sexual offenders, who cannot control their “urges” and have lived their desire up to a point of compromising another human being.
It is said that Mick Fleetwood was on stage during this performance as well.
The bedrock foundation of any processor-memory discussion is the memory hierarchy and Wegener provided this handy chart:
and cold watermelon, a triangle held in the hand
Whole Wheat Flour : 2 cups
Only Child Writes.
Now the two of them have been thrown together once again, reluctant chaperones of a group of orphan children in a post-apocalyptic world where the dead still walk...and feed. As they begin their pilgrimage to the last human outpost on Earth, can they find a way to let go of old hurts and find the love they lost--all the while attempting to save what's left of the human race?
There are many things that I can tell you as a beginners guide to investing in the stock market. Most of the things involved in this beginners guide to investing would have to include common sense.
The buyer attended the auction in person but declined to meet with the media or to be identified. Sammons and others involved in the auction would not discuss the buyer’s plans for Buford.
“Something’s Got A Hold On Me”
I'd like my nights to be longer. My mind is quiet at night and doesn't rest. It's playful, it remembers, it stops, it continues and smiles. It creates and it forgets.
320g Unsalted Butter
The following report was then submitted by the accountants: -
Cue a bonfire in the backyard: The car squealed out of the driveway. In the trunk was a canister of gasoline for "just-in-case."
sent the most wonderful goodies to keep me in scary-movie-watching, bump-in-the-night, Halloween heaven for the rest of the month and on into the Day of All Souls (November 1).
If you would like to sponsor a giveaway to one of our lucky viewers you will get an ad spot in the sidebar under the official Poll. It will remain there the entire week from Sunday night until the announcement of the winner the following Sunday. The ad space will be 225 pixels by 225 pixels (give or take) PLUS a text snippet announcing the giveaway. You will also get a post dedicated to your product/blog/website on "Viewer Appreciation Day" (day tbd)
Read how to enter below.
He just does his business and I change him.
A comma splice is when two strong clauses are joined together with just a comma instead of separating the two clauses with a conjunction, semicolon or period (full stop.) If I spliced that same sentence with a comma instead, we would get this:
_________________________________________________
Depression, anxiety, eating disorders.
Vidalia or Sweet Onion, 1/2, chopped
Florida Scott- Maxwell
Democrats and Republicans are equally guilty of it. It’s a way for the party in power to strengthen its power. It usually works, although it occasionally backfires.
Please visit David Terry Art here to arrange your print...Don't be shy... he is expecting you... I will be having mine printed just as soon as I can... and David... thank you a million times for thinking of us all... xv
2. Using the same paid search campaign for desktop and mobile.
I must have dozed off slightly for an hour or so. A feeling of breathlessness woke me from a dream.
It is not humanly possible to take care of 14 children under the age of 7 — including 8 infants (even healthy ones) all the same age — at the same time and give them the individual attention they deserve. If you have to have an army of nurses and daycare workers to parent for you, then you are not being a real parent, are you? Likewise, it is an avoiable and unnecessary health risk, both for the mother and the children, to implant 8 embryos at the same time.
When I'm around her I can't help but be happy - that's the sort of friend we all need. She is quiet but has a sunny personality. She's a traveller and wants to see the world.
Test for Monday Army:
And then she'll do
In conclusion, Shiver of the Vampires is an odd, experimental, artistic movie that serves as a great example of Rollin’s oeuvre. Beautiful and bizarre, sensual and surreal; watch this one if you’re after something different.
You know what the set is? It’s a figurine of Minnie with various bows, shoes, and outfits that can be changed out and arranged as desired. So it stands that the next thing Disney will teach my daughter is accessorizing.
English Transcript:
The conflict is that an elephant
Walking from our room to the bus stop proved to be quite the task. As we were walking down the steps of our building and Matt was telling us girls behind him to be really careful because the steps were slippery, he takes no more than two steps down and falls down a flight of stairs on his back side. I gasp and look over at Barbara who immediately starts laughing hysterically. Matt was totally okay aside from a bruised butt. Barbara told him that she would write that off as his birthday present to her.
My company had to down size, and I guess my 3 1/2 years of employment didn't make the cut.
The way they feel about you
KLASS
Needless to say, the FTC is not a big fan of PAEs:
But open them actually, so you can read this... just squint.
“I guess that’s what I get for refusing those joint replacements last year!” he said to himself. He grinned his way to the lectern on the left side of the stage. His hands opened its cabinet door and started fiddling with the projector’s settings.
You can’t resist him,
“This is very serious. Could the panel that will draft the Egyptian constitution possibly discuss such issues? Did Abdul Samea see by his own eyes the text of the message sent by Talawi to Katatni? This is unbelievable. It is a catastrophe to give the husband such a right! Has the Islamic trend reached that far? Is there really a draft law in this regard? Are there people thinking in this manner?”
With an event of this magnitude, a broadcaster must stay at the location. By all means switch between different vantage points and do reports from the crowd. But the viewer doesn't want to miss anything and wants the illusion of being there with a ringside seat.
Thank you again to PJ for hosting me! Solstice is an amazing book, and PJ a talented story-teller and creator of myth and I'm honored to be on her site.
KCFVA Blog (kcfvablog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
If you ever want to see a room of people offer vastly different opinions on one subject – bring up the topic of flatting (roommates for you Americans).
? Queen Size, measurement: 88X90” Fill 40 oz, Deluxe Fill, 260 TC 100% Combed Cotton casing.
The human attachent to things is in my opinion one of the most defining characteristics of the human race. We could theorize for days about the philosophical ideas that seperate us from the non-human animals; but as far as I am concerned it is our feirce devotion and need to have things. Our things define us, entertain us, clothe us, aid us and make human life what it is.
For those of you have have been long-time readers, my love of daffodils may come as no surprise. Even with my brown thumb, my newlywed optimism compelled me to plant daffodil bulbs, along with tulips, in a small window-box style planter below our picture window. They are blissfully low maintenance, but just the same, I always worry when I see the little green shoots pushing through the snow. Will it get below freezing? What if it gets warm and cold and warm and cold and warm and cold? My logical mind somehow doubts that such a delicate-looking plant could survive those extremes.
I found Chelsea simply amazing. It gives you access to creative work that otherwise you wouldn’t even know existed.
The beer will conform to CAMRA's definition of real ale - unpasteurised, unfiltered and with enough viable yeast to allow secondary fermentation (don't worry, we'll be checking...).
last Thursday Morning she had not been
The creative Word of
Here are a few looks from the collection:
Omens tend to be about as flighty in their predictions as, well, the flap of a bird's wing. But they can still often include elements of truth.
This was followed by another epiphany. I do the same thing to rent movies. I go to the giant digital box, find my own movie, and swipe my own card. Where is this going to lead? Am I eventually going to assemble my own hamburgers? (“Remove your patty from microwave tray 1. Use the caulking guns to apply one squirt of both ketchup and mustard. Place one undersized pickle in the very middle of your hamburger. Place only one pickle. Only one pickle.”)? Check myself into a hospital? (“Please scan your insurance card. Now press the button which best represents your medical emergency. Now place yourself in room 214.”) Or worse? “First use the long needle in the tray below to anesthetize yourself. Then follow my instructions to make three simple incisions into your own abdomen. . . . Thank you for doing self-serve surgery. This system was invented by the same man who first engineered the customer loyalty card for your keychain.”
Danny, You know I did.
Staying calm, composed and how to concentrate on positive influences and as a starter guide for self improvement.
And as traitors gathered to watch it die,
So far in our bird unit we have learned about what different birds look like, what they eat, where they live, and the sounds that they make. Last week we extended our affinity for birds by having the students create their own birds and all the details that go along with them.
And now to the wonderful recipients of this award. I would like to bestow this to:
Roasted Almond Flatbread
Not sure why. Hmmm, maybe because our kids are not keen with it? Their ages do correlate to the length of absence. Maybe it's time to reintroduce it in our kitchen.
Back on the path after about an hour we soon find ourselves (after a minor diversion involving a Rolls Royce Silver Cloud and more unidentifiable, to us anyway, earthworks) going through our first stretch of forest – some may call it a copse or (as the sign claims) a plantation but I’m a city boy and to me it’s a forest. Feeling revived from our short tea-break surrounded by the pines and ferns we brave the increasingly challenging wind and precipitation to push on to Plain Trees and our first chance to actually touch The Wall.
One thing on my mind is safety & emergency planning. I will be making this trip without my husband & children. While some might think this sort of trip would be liberating, for me it’s mostly about planning for the unknown.
Audience recording
Do not appear desperate. Do not call up every hour, leave sweet messages and make it obvious that you want your ex back. This will make you look like a complete idiot and your stock in the eyes of your ex will drop dramatically, as you will seem like an absolute wimp.
Money Talks
Consulting; Lola Talabi-Oni, ,
I have been feeling like I have been in a fog and I think the fog is finally lifting. I hope I can feel like a better unschooling mama and be more present with the kids. There has been a couple of days that Jazmin has kind of had a hard time, when she starts thinking too much about not being able to hit the open road. (If I start thinking about it too much, I start to feel claustrophobic, so I know where she is coming from). But she has been loving going over to the gym and the pool just opened up, so I know she will want to swim a lot!
I know my soul can always find a reason to say this, and that is why I must sort through soul laundry, must find the filthy, un-right things, must be washed with the water of the Word.
He doesn’t treat us as our sins deserve,
All my sticker, bits that I have not opened yet....letter stickers etc..all get hung up on here........i have learnt over the last year that I do not use it if I cannot see it...so having everything out like this really works for me...I just added a curtain pole to the bottom of the shelf.............it works REALLY REALLY well!!!!!!!!!!
so that when I go back to the UK I can remember that, why yes,
This past week I've been working on a sermon from Psalm 16, a beautiful golden jewel of a psalm. Some commentaries argue that the crux of the psalm is in verse 8, where it says, "I have set the Lord always before me, because he is at my right hand, I shall not be shaken." I've been pondering what it means to mindfully keep the Lord day by day in the very center of our lives, indeed, of our very souls. What it might look like for me.
It is a beautiful red-orange with the most amazing micro-glitter. It applies very smoothly, and is just jelly enough to let the glitter show all it's sparkly goodness.
A story once told by the father of Smokers' Rights Gian Turci struck a chord with me and made me realise that I was no longer a person who smoked - I was a smoker. Something I'd never considered myself to be before.
A contempt citing by Congress against the executive branch, a strong sanction, is considered by some to be politically risky; especially if it doesn’t succeed. Sources say that’s why Republican staffers have taken a great deal of time trying to build support among colleagues in advance of the citation’s formal release, which could come in the next few weeks if not sooner.
soon enough (or an hour later), back inside my apartment, i was a bit riled and had forfeited friday yoga. but i was more grateful than ever to be back inside my home.
Today she offered her advice to a few listeners, including the newly married bride and groom that’s paranoid the other one is cheating! Read all the letters below, and add any advice you may have!
Frazier LM, Hage ML. Reproductive Hazards of the Workplace. Wiley, August 1997: 1-600.
You love your kee-kee. (Blankie.)
In this kung fu caper, a prostitute turned assassin codenamed Phoenix (Veronica Ngo) must pull one final job to secure her freedom from powerful crimelord Black Dragon. Her mission is to steal a highly valuable laptop containing defense codes that control VINSTAT-1, Vietnam's satellite system. To ensure cooperation, Black Dragon incentivises Phoenix further by leveraging her daughter's life against the success of this heist.
That is not to say however that pregnancy and parenthood give your carte blanch to pack on the pounds and give up – but I would say that things will not be the same afterwards as before.
The results of the Boston Marathon are in, and tremendous results they were with Geoffrey Mutai (2:03:02, KEN) and Moses Mosop (2:03:06, KEN) running the two fastest times ever! Two others ran under 2:05:00, with Ryan Hall’s 2:04:58 the fastest ever run by an American. Of course the other news coming out of Boston is that the winning mark does not qualify as a world record due to the configuration of the course – point to point course with a primarily downhill slope (in spite of the dreaded “hills”). This is in contrast to more flattened courses that are “loops”.
I've always encouraged my kids to the non-fiction and they do enjoy it: they love reading about the Holocaust (we read Night, by Weisel) and are shocked at what they learn in that unit. We have in the past read from Into Thin Air, RMS Titanic, and we've read about the Montgomery bus boycott.
Vancouver Family leaves Paris next month. It's sad but I take comfort in the fact they'll only be a few hours drive from Seattle. If we really have a hankering, we can go see them. Of course, with the way Lucien tornadoed through their apartment, they probably won't let us through the front door. So we'll look through their windows and wave, and that will be enough.
It's a funny thing. Just yesterday, mother's day (which I still hate), I was missing Sophia and wondering at how I have taken to avoiding grief and even this blog. I've meant to write often but always found a reason not to. The reason has largely been that I've wanted to avoid being sucked back into the awful world of grief and loss. I've wanted to deny my membership of this club of angel mommies. Not that I've wanted to deny Sophia - never. But I've wanted to avoid the raw pain of this world.
Not to say that there aren’t problems with the service in Korea. The main complaints I’ve heard have been that the employees feel the need to lurk or follow you around while you’re browsing, sometimes pressuring you to buy and getting angry if you don’t. It stands to say that making your customers feel uncomfortable isn’t good for business, even if they do end up buying something.
Cliff has been on a whirlwind tour of television and radio shows across the U.S. the last few weeks to promote his new 'Sacred Fire' EP which features Armstrong. Armed with just his acoustic guitar he has been playing a mix of his iconic origins, new tunes from the EP and his cover of The Clash's 'Guns Of Brixton'. Watch a few performances below.
It was fascinating, I learnt so much in about half an hour of frenzied sharing. It was so interesting I hope to go back, hopefully with a publisher or a designer and have some further discussions. It's too late for my next book, and I'm not advocating cover design by committee, but I think it's worth knowing - and listening to - what our audiences are looking for in a book cover.
Fortune is in the ring now.
Sharshar had seen this. He spotted the demand, like a sharp-eyed market analyzer. He smelled the silent agony and the distress of ‘his people’. And being a realist, he identified the flaw in their thinking process. He believed the only way to relieve them from their misery was to enhance the ill-informed part of their minds with more superstitions. He decided that he’d be the one to do it. He will be their ‘savior’. He knew how to handle people, and the more he’ll excel at scamming them, the more marketing they’ll do for him.
“When alcoholism strikes, very unnatural situations may develop which work against marriage partnership and compatible unions.
To serve:
So although my neighbor knew what was going on from the start and had generously offered to babysit when she got home from work, I felt like I needed to call in the troops for reinforcement (the troops being my parents). They threw some overnight stuff together and hurried over. All while I ran around throwing a bag together for myself. Once they got here I piled in the car and headed to be with my man.
Extreme Anti-Immigrant Legislation Threatens Business, Workers and FamiliesThis week, US Representative Lamar Smith (R-TX) plans to introduce legislation to mandate that all American businesses screen their employees’ authorization to work through the Department of Homeland Security E-Verify system. The following is a statement of the Illinois People’s Action and Latinos United for Change:
From what I’ve seen Chambers feels sincerely bad about what he did and is eager to redeem himself, and if he can qualify for the games then I think good on him.
There have been times that I’ve read reviews of my book from people who are literally strangers (I don’t know them!) and they have read my book…and they “get” my book. They “get” what I was trying to do. Their reviews brought me to tears. It makes it all worth it. It’s my favorite part.
From my ruled notebooks:
Closed by order of Board of Health for "operating without a permit". I'll post more as it comes.
There is only one Beethoven!
This recipe came from a Midwest Living…the Yankee equivalent to Southern Living, which I cannot live without. I probably have every issue for the last 30 years. But Midwest Living is good too. And they do a special fall issue featuring travels spots throughout the midwest that is outstanding! Good recipes too. In fact, my old Toll House Chocolate Chip Cookie recipe got demoted when I found a new chocolate chip cookie recipe in a Midwest Living a couple of years ago!
And also Business Times:
Now, in their defense, I have seen a couple of middle-aged juicers walk out with some middle-aged mommies in black spandex. I'm pretty sure they weren't going for a gatorade.
mr. wannabe and little a-man by my side.
But the old Lena is dead too.
Since I'm getting older + and I know I'm lacking in the energy department + I've been trying to add a few new things to my diet. The backstory is that supplements, organic foods, and produce cost about 20% more in the grocery store + and when your paying college tuition and other expenses on a budget + you tend to look in the cheaper direction when you shop, which leaves me only purchasing what's on sale that week. I've already cut back in the take out department + and that's mainly because I can't afford it. I feel that my $20 bones is better spent buying a meal that will last for a few days rather than one that will last for one night.
Performing COSHH risk assessments on the cleaning chemicals used in any commercial building is ultimately the responsibility of the cleaning contractor and can be time consuming and very expensive. Jangro provides a full set of Chemical Risk Assessments on all of its products.
Makes heads turn at the drop of her name
Amy Duff created a ribbon for a dear friend. Amy says, "I started with a Bravissimo ribbon from Making Memories. I used a cupcake liner and then added an extra large scallop punch in cream cardstock. I punched a large salmon colored circle from card stock, added the sticker sentiment from Celebrate Life #39046 and a ribbon border from Think Pink #49010, then popped it with foam dots. I placed the pink ribbon sticker, also from Celebrate Life, on a piece of cream cardstock, trimmed, and attached it to the top."
PS And check out the comments for an exciting giveaway from Frances Lincoln.
11. I've Had A Very Merry Christmas - Jerry Lewis
On the other hand, the metro is extremely clean, because they wash it every evening like crazy! Besides it has very useful screens showing weather forecast and name days. It also has different music playing and information in English, that makes it a pleasure to ride metro (if you exclude the extreme crowded morning moments). Besides many stops have a theme and are very beautiful, but it`ll take another blog post to show you the photos.
“Progress” isn’t exactly how Obama described the country’s energy picture in 2008, when gas prices were closing in on $4 a gallon. Then, it was a clear sign of “Washington’s failure to lead on energy,” which was “turning the middle-class squeeze into a devastating vise-grip for millions of Americans.”
At about 9:30 p.m., Theresa DeMarco, 56, was driving when a deputy stopped her for a loud muffler.
The downside to Facebook is that it isn't archived or searchable or editable. Argh! Not good when you want to find dated posts and photos. But you can play Scrabble with your friends and loved ones! Super fun!
He called it … Dad
That is the Greatest Celebrity Sighting EVER!! I think you’ve given some legitimacy to my blog. To date I’ve only had run-ins with Steve Levy and Jim J. Bullock, not really on the same level as Lady G. And how crazy is it that The Fredman Bloggin’ used to have a whole section devoted to Lady Gaga and here my Dad is attending mass with her?!
I decided to defy GPS Woman again, and turned left at the Metro instead of heading back to the Land of Highways. Against all odds, I decided to, dammitall, try to find a parking space at the station. I drove slowly up and down each lane, ever hopeful but to no avail. There wasn’t an empty parking space to be had in the entire place. But, lo and behold, a woman appeared from nowhere, got in her car, and drove away. Victory! I sped into her spot and beat an aching back path to the Metro entrance and – dun-dun-dun-dun – the hug and the paper.
So many people are happy to have their children go off to school in the Fall, I've always said that I would miss mine! Parents talk about how awful the teen years are, I love talking with my daughters and their friends! I've heard so many homeschooling parents talk about how hard it is to get their kids to do the assigned work, I say why not just unschool! It makes me different. It doesn't mean I'm not accepted by the people that I know, just that they don't understand where I am coming from, and much of the time I don't understand them!
Not exactly a run-of-the-mill operation worthy of song and dance, but it was note-worthy enough.
Once the cloth was soaked it must be pounded. Without mills, the cloth is soaped and stamped on by bare feet. The first mill, however, came into being in France during the 11th century and by the 12th century were in England as well.
Thus, for as long as Dave and his cronies continue to throw away lives for no purpose, he might as well do the honest thing and hire in a dustcart, instead of wasting money on expensive hearses that the public now will not be seeing. The symbolism would be entirely appropriate and serve merely to underline what our masters are doing with our money and soldiers' lives out in Afghanistan.
An ally of peace
Packed with the beautiful anger of youth
Caring about the detail makes all the difference. It doesn't matter whether it is something so simple that we can do it with our eyes shut or whether the task is a complex and challenging one...attention to detail is everything. It shows that you have taken time, that you care and that you are serious....Paying attention to the detail illuminates a generosity of spirit...it is a way to be noticed and a way to show that you are a keen observer....
3 large red onions halved and sliced (don’t slice too thinly – about ¼ inch. If you slice them too thinly, they’ll dry out in the oven)
* What, if anything, do you think historical writers should bear in mind when writing for a younger audience?
Happy Saturday everyone. I have to apologize to most of you for not reading your blogs for the past week. I wish I could say that it's all because I was so busy getting out and meeting new people but that wasn't the case. I was just in a reading funk and when I am like that I don't leave the comments that you all deserve. So onward and upward today.
Dr. Chickenhiemer made his way between Bantum’s legs and clucked innocently.
7. Your parents don’t want what is best for you. They want what is good for you, which isn’t always the same thing. There is a natural instinct to protect our children from risk and discomfort, and therefore to urge safe choices. Theodore Roosevelt—soldier, explorer, president—once remarked, “It is hard to fail, but it is worse never to have tried to succeed.” Great quote, but I am willing to bet that Teddy’s mother wanted him to be a doctor or a lawyer.
Having spent enough time in a hospital she new it to be real blood and not a dream as she had hoped. Slowly she stood and new that she did not have much time before the street outside became crowded with people, one of them would surely call the police and there would be questions. The questions would not stop coming until she provided an answer, answers that she could not provide. This fact she knew clear as the light that was coming on stronger now.
“I’m not sure about this Matt,” Riley whispered looking at the concrete floor.
So my family and friends, now you know why when you call you never know if I will pick up the cell phone in Tucson or in Canada. Next stop… China.
Welcome to the website for KJP Farm! We are a small scale, family run boer goat farm in New Plymouth, Idaho.
Last August I was caught up in the familial melodrama of Pop's death. It was a blessing, releasing him as it did from the sadness of Alzheimers and all that meant for him and the whole family. Bitterness was rekindled for me, as he had lived that long, long life, the final 15 years or so lost to the tangle of the disease. A few short years before he died, my dear old friend O'Hare had been lost to breast cancer. She was 45 years old, her youngest son only 5 years old when she died. Pop had to be buried and the sad chores of probate undertaken, and I'd been out of touch with Daisy for some while. This worried me not at all, for with Daisy I have the shared memories that knit us together for always. We would talk at the holidays, I thought, and went back to the work at hand. But it turns out that Daisy spent last August tangled in her own love and grief.
Flu Symptoms
It doesn’t matter what the genre, I have liked pretty nearly every damn thing Bruce Campbell has done. He really gained my respect when he had “Bruce” shot on his property in southern Oregon. And they built a town there to film the movie. He’s one of a few actors I’d find it a real pleasure to meet because he has no problem mocking himself.
1 measure Creme of Tartar: 1 measure Cornflour: 2 measures Bicarbonate of Soda: approximately 2- 2.5 measures of Coconut Oil. Add the coconut oil slowly, mixing your mixture very well in between additions of oil. It is easier to add more, than to take away (which obviously means you need to add more dry ingredients ). If you prefer, you can use less Coconut Oil and add some Jojoba, or other oils which you like.
That's it for me this week. I'm off to work but when I get back I intend to find my Copic markers. There's a picture that needs colouring! In the meantime, I hope you'll check out WOYWW over on Julia's blog. Have fun!
After the Fall there was a man known as The Prophet. He was a small thin man. His face was covered in burns and scabs and he wrapped himself up in bandages to hide his visage from the people he preached to as he crossed the forsaken Earth.
My extra days off are nearly over...but Birthday Fortnight is in effect! My party is on Saturday! Woo hoo! And I have a dress that I've been saving since I thrifted it back in MAY. Can't wait to show it off.
Governments insist repeatedly that these kinds of subsidies are good economics.
Although I was sad and would have never wanted things to end the way they did, I also saw even at the time, that everything happened for a reason. I knew had Rob remained alive, he would have made my life and my son’s a living hell. I just knew he’d never truly leave us alone, just as my Dad had done with my Mom when she left him. The parallels with my Mom’s life and mine were often very similar.
As the club is neither a major employer nor essential to the Scottish or UK economies, one trusts that no public funds will be forthcoming to bail it out.
I went on the defensive and said I last blogged about the theatre in August of this year and she snorted...which is unfair, I think she was just sarcastic and did not snort at all and then I had a sulk.
I was talking to a very knowledgeable friend about whether solar power will become cheaper than coal in the next decade, and he pointed out a problem in how solar advocates price their power. It's well known that you can't just estimate a solar panel's value based on its peak production capability, because much of the time that panel is producing less power or none at all, doing nothing to amortize costs.
Just this week we had the privilege of speaking to Dr. Clem Price, who is on the Advisory Board for the National Museum of African American History and Culture. He talked about how they’ve decided to tell a narrative that is common to all American people, but do so through the lens of the African American. It’s not that I don’t agree with the idea it just becomes a question of identity for me. Is this way of telling the African American story in the United States a concession to identity or is it trying to create a universal identity? I’m not sure. I’ll definitely be interested to see the museum when it opens. All I know is that when the National Museum of American History doesn’t want to share the Greensboro Lunch Counter with the National Museum of African American History and Culture there’s definitely a larger question of identity at work. So my answer to the question of identity? Identity is personal and often not able to be unpacked without some misinterpretations and misunderstandings along the way, but that doesn’t mean that if we listen, watch, and learn that we won’t be able to understand the finer nuances another person’s identity.
He claimed that Azmin had been manipulating the party election results and that his working relationship with Kedah and Selangor had suffered because of Azmin.
I'm still shooting.
What About Treats?!
We all have reasons
A perfect example for you: there is a bookstore in Lynchburg that I love. The entire upstairs area is crammed with used paperbacks that range from $0.99 – $3.99. There are SOME big name titles (King, Grisham, Koontz, etc.) but most of the titles are from authors I’ve never heard of. For the past 4 years or so, I’ll swing by there and pick up random titles by random authors.
This morning I went with my running group to New Prague (which is not pronounced like the Czech city). New Prague was an adorable little town but in the boonies. It was pure Minnesota. There was polka music playing at the start!
"Why is this place called Los Angeles?" Witch baby asked. "There aren't any angels." "Maybe there are. Sometimes I see angels in the people I love," said Weetzie. "What do angels look like?" "They have wings and carry lilies," Cherokee said. "And they have blonde hair," she added, tossing her braids. "Clutch pig!" Said Witch Baby under her breath. She tugged at her own dark tangles. "No, Cherokee," said Weetzie. "That's just in some old paintings. Angels can look like anyone. They can look like mysterious, beautiful, purple eyed girls."
If you look closely, you can see a date stamp on the underside of the cap. Both of my cameras have one, and they are different enough that I can't decipher them for sure. I think this one was made in 1961. There is another stamp on the bottom of the camera under the plastic.
The most precious moments,
Meanwhile ... in Utah on Christmas Day ... Ben and his girlfriend, Kaye went to my parents's house. Here they are with my nieces and niece and nephew to be - Ben, Kaye, Destry ("Fall down a well, eyes go crossed. Get kicked by a mule, they back to normal. I don't know." See? No original thought - just movie lines), Heidyn, Tanner, and Ashley.
Though some of the contents of your books are quite hard hitting, for example rape in A Concise Chinese English Dictionary for Lovers, or the poverty and future of China in UFO in Her Eyes, there is also a lot of dark and wry humour, is that intentional in your writing?
Maybe you’re wondering what I listen to when I write. I hate just listening to myself type, so yes, I do listen to something. Lately, I’ve looked forward to listening to something cool while I write more than I look forward to writing my script. (Hmm, I sound grumpy or something… better go hug Neville to feel better! I’m not grumpy, though; I would just rather be working on another story idea, but I need to finish Screnzy since it ends in a few days.) So, here’s what I’ve been listening to way too much!
If you're nowhere near Northamptonshire (and I can hear the Aussie and American blog readers saying, but what about us?!) then Helen is still taking bookings for her Hop on, Hop off Online writing course. The idea is you sign up for some or all of the modules, and do them online on a date which suits you. Details here.
At NAB, Broadpeak will demonstrate its operatorCDN solution which offers operators a way to increase revenue by managing their own Content Delivery Network. Broadpeak will also showcase its +screensCDN solution, a streaming system that delivers high-quality content to multiple screens.
One of the five girls to have given evidence during the trial at Liverpool Crown Court has said she had sex with Mr Qayyum, who she knew as Tiger. Mr Qayyum has told the jury the girl must have been mistaken and that he was not known as Tiger. He told the court he had worked as a taxi driver before setting up his own breakdown recovery business.
Beat his brains out
Thank you, Victoria for hosting me on Always a Booklover.
2. THAT friend is in half the “wild” stories involving the person you’re dating:
Dear Mr Zuma ...
That. Where I once stood.
Frankly, 21 Jump Street is not that funny. There are two or three parts where I actually laughed, but there’s nothing special. The movie is immensely predictable and the characters are boring. There’s really nothing to review. You would think a movie adaptation of the popular TV show would be something special and worth remembering. I could barely remember the two main characters’ names, or any of the other characters for that matter. It’s a passover movie, nothing more… Unless you have an uncontrollable fetish for penis jokes.
Cantankerously represented?
Okay. That's all. What's your random thought for the day?
In the late Seventies and Eighties, I had too many experiences where I was served a pint of soup masquerading as beer and, on taking it back to the bar, was told “it’s real ale, Sir, it’s meant to be like that.” On a couple of occasions the barperson even said “and you’ve had a drink out of it!” as a reason not to change it. And there were a handful of times when I was handed a pint with obvious bits of white stuff floating in it. At that time, the perception that it was frequently cloudy was a major disincentive to many drinkers trying cask beer.
When they finally did, people were not kettled, as in the student demonstrations, but simply forced further down the High Street as looting continued. M&S, Vodafone, H&M and McDonalds all had their windows smashed. I recieved a torrent of abuse online for expressing support for the riots. The same abuse I expect Martin Luther King recieved for saying “A riot is the language of the unheard”. The same abuse I expect Bob Marley recieved for singing “That’s why we gonna be burning and looting tonight…” Sorry, but my solidarity does not lie with corporations making millions and their fully-insured smashed windows, it lies with human beings who lose their lives and their families. Nor, for that matter, does it lie with the politicians, now so quick to condemn the riots, who sent the British army to burn and loot in Afghanistan and Iraq.
Another place that people seem to have a unique ability to ignore the rest of humanity is the self-checkout line at the grocery store. Granted grocery stores do a terrible job of clarifying where people should line up, but most people figure it out. Inevitably, when the store is busy and people are lined up, someone will cluelessly, or so they pretend, stroll up right behind the registers and jump the line.
Churches aside…I read something yesterday which got me thinking about individual believers–those that have trusted Christ for salvation, and call ourselves Followers of Jesus. In his book, Barefoot Church, (a great read about the church’s mandate to serve the poor and “the least of these”–and that we largely aren’t doing it), author Brandon Hatmaker spends a little time unpacking one of the biggest causes of that lack of attention to the mission:
Having an undesired length of hair. Hairstyles go in and they go out. Usually it’s pretty easy to keep up, except when it’s not. If you cut your hair at the beginning of the year only to find that everybody else was lifting prince charmings into their bedrooms with their hair, here are a few solutions.
It’s a good little introduction to where the action is on the origins debate but regular readers will have read it all before.
Row 11- sc in 8, sc dec, sc in 8 (17)
Hope all of you are doing well and enjoying a great cup of
Cravings I couldn't resist: Easter Food! Nor would I want to resist it...
Original Ninfa’s on Navigation
Admittedly, I'm entirely too addicted to TV. Normally, when the TV goes out during a storm, I get grumpy, but survive. I have a high-speed internet connection, and can use that to amuse me.
Pictured above, is the jellybeans design center that I designed. I wanted the center and/or desk area to feel like a little inspiration island in the middle of the sensory overloaded store of many sweet things. As a general rule of mine for any small space, I am a firm believer in creating "islands" or "pockets" of creative think spaces. This one happened to be only a 4x5 foot space.
In this month's Tips & Tricks, we will explore how to set up DJ-essential features such as pre-listening, EQ Three and the crossfader, then look at how Live works in the context of a DJ set.
At any rate, Giulini conducted a deeply felt rendition here.
"No Graves as Yet" begins on the day the Archduke in Sarajevo and his wife are assassinated in an event that led directly to World War I. It's a tragic day for two brothers as well -- Matthew, an intelligence agent, and his brother Joseph, a one-time clergyman who started teaching at Cambridge after the death of his wife a year before. The brothers' parents are killed while journeying to London -- the father bringing Matthew of document of serious national importance and treason. They discover that what seem to be an accident was a deliberate act and the document is nowhere to be found.
This was a pretty good book... an easy read. I haven't seen the movie yet, so I'm anxious to see how it compares to the book. The story follows 2 best friends, Rachel and Darcy, one the classic "pushover" (Rachel) and one the popular, pretty one (Darcy). As Rachel turns 30, she finds herself in a sticky situation when she falls in love with Dexter, Darcy's fiance. She must choose between the love of her life, or her oldest friendship. Overall... I would recommend it. The ending was a bit of a surprise, and I'm not sure I cared for the way things were finalized, but nevertheless, it was worth reading.
Even if the benefits were not there, my husband and I would still feel compelled to make music with our kids; that's just how we are. There are so many instruments in our home that we can hardly name them all: acoustic and electric guitars, ukulele, folk harp, synth, piano, harmonicas, bongos, etc.
NeighborWoods,and been instrumental in planning the world’s longest arboretum: Atlanta’s long-awaited and ever-elusive 22-mile BeltLine project: a loop of unused railways lines and adjacent parks that when finally realized, will increase the greenspace, livability and community of Atlanta beyond description.
We can assess the credibility of a channel by listening for improbabilities, implausibilities, impossibilities, contradictions and inconsistencies. This is what a judge does when he or she listens to testimony. On the basis of the presence of too many of these flaws, the judge feels fairly comfortable in deciding the testimony to be non-credible, on a balance of probabilities (that is, more likely than not).
The interests of justice were best served by trying as many of the claims as possible in the same court at the same time. In this case that was the Patents Court, since it had had exclusive jurisdiction over the European applications and non-exclusive jurisdiction over the foreign applications corresponding to the pending US applications.
Though a discussion of this nature might strike some as being somewhat off-colour, it is important to bear in mind that genocide is not being advocated here. Rather, it is being observed that genocide has been an ever-present factor during history, not least the history of the 20th century. Irrespective of the existence of this document or the exact nature of its content, the cloud of lurking genocide will grow ever-darker over Europe as Islamization proceeds. It would be intellectually and morally negligent not to point this out.
* The rigging sails of every ship that sailed the high seas during the 18th and 19th centuries was made of hemp.
Toby Blackwell, 83, and his nephew Nigel, founders of the Blackwell bookshop chain, are in at number 393 with a fortune of £195m, the same amount as in 2011.
The card stock is SU!s retired Kraft and 2011 In-Color Pear Pizzazz. Sentiment is SU!s Teeny Tiny Wishes stamped with Early Expresso. The trees are a die and embossing folder set from Cuttlebug that is made up of three trees and a Santa shaped like a tree. The lovely bling is by Zva and the puffy snow is Liquid Applique.
A few other kitchen tips I learned:
A kaleidoscope of colours was unveiled above the River Tyne as Britain's biggest light artwork shone out. Nocturne, a 360-metre creation by artist Nayan Kulkarni burst into life over Newcastle and Gateshead's historic quaysides.
“Not so long ago, when Jack was more of a boy becoming a man, than the man he has become, he followed Crow into the Spirit Plane to find a cure for Olive, the FourSeasons witch. The Spirit Plane does strange things with humans. Jack took on the form of a wolf for three days. He was even wounded by a vampire in that form. I have come to believe that Jack has wolf dreams when magic gathers too strongly around him.”
I meant to get back earlier — I have tons of photos from our local Tour of California in May I’m excited about sharing. I decided to forego the video this year in favor of still shots, and I’m pretty happy with the results.
To view objects at night there are currently two available technologies, image enhancement and thermal infrared. Image enhancement collects input from the lower level of the infrared spectrum plus any other source of light, man made or natural, and then amplifies it. Scopes constructed to utilize this system are known as starlight scopes.
I have to admit that while plenty of Damien Walter's "Weird Things" columns at The Guardian are interesting, and it's really wonderful to see a major newspaper paying regular attention such stuff, and Walter seems like a passionate and thoughtful person ... the latest one, titled, "Should science fiction and fantasy do more than entertain?" pretty much made me gag. Mostly it was that headline that caused the coughing and sputtering; the piece itself isn't terrible, is well intentioned, and seems primarily aimed at a general audience. I'm not a general audience for the topic, so in my ways, I'm a terrible reader for what Walter wrote. Thus, I'll refrain from comment on the main text.
We experienced some trying times together and prevailed to what I thought was progression in our relationship. Despite career loss and even a miscarriage, we remained together; a sure sign that he was the one.
17. Unfortunately, the English Standard Version translation used in this edition does not point to it. We hope that this defect is repaired in future editions of the ESV.
Ex 15:26 If you will diligently listen to the voice of the Lord your God, and will do what is right in His sight, will give ear to His commandments, and keep all His statutes, I will put none of these diseases upon you which I have brought upon the Egyptians. For I am the Lord who heals you.
Alexandra graduated from Truman University with a degree in theatre before deciding she preferred to bring her characters to life on paper rather than stage. She currently lives in Missouri with her extraordinarily patient husband and sons.
Clouds of tainted silver, restless as the troubled seas.
Well, guess what? The future has arrived and, for a generation or two of Americans, unless the debt is dramatically reduced, they will be little more than slaves of the federal government who exist to pay off all the borrowing and all the imploding social justice programs such as Social Security and Medicare.
If you are easily offended, you may skip this review. However, I see no problem with featuring this website because they offer a great selection of something everyone needs – underwear. That’s right eUndies carries cute panties! I’m a believer that you can never have too many pairs of underwear! So, when I had the chance to work with the newly re-designed/launched eUndies.com, I was happy.
Because I am bored, and as previously mentioned, attention-seeking, here is my list of funny/dorky/lame jobs:
Small splash of liqueur (optional - I used ameretto)
freesounds.org
Shareology spotted the absence of activity at Our Little Secret’s previous location across from Bachman’s and did a quick turn to check out the situation. The sign above meant she was off to 494 and Lyndale on opening day; after all, it is her favorite earrings store. (and bags and necklaces and all thing marvelous, marvelously priced….)
Purpose: to connect with people to see them live out their dreams
Ponder and Apply – !!
The jacket review quotes call the book “mesmerizing” and a “tour de force”. I would not go that far. I would call the book entertaining. Not only is the story itself good, but the glimpse into 15th century Italy and the world of this great artist and inventor is very enjoyable.
This room is coming along nicely. I have a few things that are still in need of paint--the china cabinet, a different chandelier, and the art for over the sideboard. But its slowly coming together, and I love that this back wall is what I see when I sit on my sofa in the living room.
14. Joni Mitchell "I Had a King" 3:34
I see little tourtières in my future..salmon pies..
I watched her get pregnant against her long-suffering husband's will. I noted the wedge she'd driven between him and his brother; her profligate spending in denial of their financial straits; her plunge into depression matching their plummet down the social ladder; her total meltdown when things go tragically wrong.
The four leaf clovers grow wild, and the necklace pendants are assembled by hand and made to order; so it takes a little longer to receive them, but it’s totally worth the wait!! And, they’re currently just $25.
decision made for this child of mine.
Tip: For best pani-puri flavor, make pani with your homemade masala rather than store-bought.
And Other Random Tales.
For as often as the subject was brought up, placin’ all prejudice aside because of the color of his skin, before some idiot made a big deal of it (no doubt some people did), Joe’s fight with Rocky Marciano ranked up there with the greatest defeats ever. And more awful and wretched, substantially more devastatin’ to Lucky than anything that had ever happened at home! Christ!
8. Why did you start blogging?
Blue Foundation was founded in 2000 by producer/singer Tobias Wilner. Their lineup consists of Wilner (producer, multi-instrumentalist and vocalist) and Bo Rande (multi-instrumentalist). Best known for their songs “Eyes on Fire” (certified double platinum in the US) from the “Twilight” saga and “Sweep” from Michael Mann's “Miami Vice,” the band released their first 7" via Moshi Moshi Records and their first, self-titled debut album was released shortly thereafter.
target shooting
What are the things you most enjoy about running a small press?
Oz told me that I should return to the mural in another two or three weeks…said Kier usually takes a couple of weeks to complete everything. He also said that he and Kier were just going over drawings for the next mural…and that it is going to be even bigger and better than this one…grander in scale.
Diamonds are said to Bring fierceness, strength and fortitude. Strengthens friendships and protects from evil, disease and plagues. If set in gold it drives away night monsters... When stolen attracts negative vibrations. Diamonds require cleaning often.
“Frankly, we are not close to an agreement,” Boehner said. “I would just suggest it is going to be a hot weekend here in Washington, D.C.”
Budget is very important when buying something because if you don’t have enough budget but you want to buy the item, you will just get frustrated. However, you may want to consider buying Saucony running shoes. They come with a very reasonable price because Saucony shoes are very durable and they are proven to last long without sacrificing the comfort they can give to your feet. Saucony shoes have been tested by professional runners so you are guaranteed that these shoes can really perform well.
LoveS.
Nachos P65.00 (Tortilla chips topped with cheese sauce and home-made tomato salsa on the side.)
This is when having a few meals in the freezer ready to go is a a true life-saver. Tonight we're having stuffed peppers I froze in December. All my lovely husband had to do was get them out and turn on the oven. Nice and easy.
Over the years, I’ve learned who my sources are…who I can trust to give me the information that I can bank on. I studied those sources constantly over the last two weeks. After that first weekend of visits, before the Titans reared their ugly heads, my source basically said that unless the sky falls, the choice is Denver. But after the 8 hour visit with the Titans that same source said that this could be the sky falling because he started to waffle about the decision he thought he’d already made. I stayed the course though. I hung on every word and hoped upon hope that in the end he’d realize his original choice was original for a reason. Then Monday came and I got out of my weekly staff meeting to find Twitter blowing up with reports that he’d chosen Denver.
She’s got freedom in the 21st century. Funny how I don’t necessarily get song lyrics until after somebody spells them out for me, what they mean. I thought “freedom at 21″ meant one thing until a reviewer pointed out it was about a blackberry-obsessed woman who doesn’t give a rat’s ass about the effect she has on people, and that slapped the whole thing into a new perspective for me. So then I went to look up the lyrics, and the subject of the song went from being someone admirable to someone despicable.
For the very first time ever, I am joining in on the Ultimate Blog Party excitement! So, here we go!
Parenting in Children’s School Success.” Journal of Cross-Cultural Psychology 27 (1996): 403-23. Print.
We've been on curvy and treacherous roads since July. Literally.Metaphorically. Roads with names like Shock, Grief, Funeral, Memorial, Probate, District Attorney, Crime Unit Investigations. We are tired and worn out. We sleep poorly. Our patterns have changed. Our foundation has shifted.
I was in some pain but it's nothing compared to having my tubes removed. I found my big comfy chair, watched crappy TV and rested. It was great! Travis brought me a pumpkin pie from Costco and that was just wonderful!!! I also made a huge crock-pot of soup! I mean huge! I'll be freezing it, bringing it to work and eating it for weeks!
(Audience FLAC)
The only people I could imagine complaining about this might be particular fans of therianthropic fantasy, but they should probably already know that the ‘were’ part of ‘werewolf’ is referring to being part-human, not animal transformation. Linguistic rigour is important in your hobbies. But possibly there are other flaws I’m overlooking, which people are invited to detail in the comments.
Add 1/4 Cup roasted eggplant to the food processor also.
The law requires that any women seeking an abortion have an abdominal ultrasound - which she must pay for - prior to having the abortion. The original bill required an ultrasound to determine the gestational age of the fetus. Apparently the proponents did not know/understand that in the first trimester a traditional abdominal ultrasound does not work to determine fetal age. The only way to accomplish that is a trans-vaginal ultrasound. That is, an ultrasound probe that is inserted thru the vagina. After a demonstration last week, that requirement was dropped, and the abdominal procedure ("jelly on the belly") specified.
Megan lives at home with her mother who has MS, and they are struggling, Megan has to go to the food banks, works part-time and has to keep her grades up to stay in the private school she is attending. She has a deep dark secret that she has only told one person, her brother. Her brother who was high one night ended up bringing home a dangerous friend and left Megan in a very unsafe situation.
What makes the book so entertaining is its range. Along the way one picks up fascinating bits of information: fingerprinting has been challenged as a reliable source of identification in American courts: narrative theory is inexorably creeping into legal discussions of evidence.
“You’re almost here and it seems like you’re full of enthusiasm and desire to come to the light. I try to imagine how you look but in vain! I saw you in my dreams more than once but each time you looked different!”
Mr Foulsham says that “all your capital is tied up there, whether it be the building if you own it, or the contents or machinery, office furniture, fixtures or fittings”.
Some years ago I had spotted a jar of black cherries soaked in kirsch at my beloved papa's pad. Typically while visiting Henry there will be some point when I rearrange his kitchen shelves and cupboards (putting like things with like things, so that he doesn't end up with 17 jars of opened olives, for example) and I root through his fridge, binning anything that looks as if it might be about to launch a bid for freedom - items that are unusually blue or furry.
My favourite crisps are potato flavoured.
Have a lovely Sunday folks :)
Spot of my thirties! whose wistful ambition sighs
Keep coming back here over the coming days, or better still, subscribe to this blog, as I continue to offer useful tips for interviews throughout december and January – now is the time to be gearing up for the new year increase in recruitment activity.
Synchronized data is worth the expense because it’s a hallmark of human interactions. If I talk to a friend and they keep asking me for information I know they already have, I have a right to get irritated. In the age of Big Data, I hold brands to the same standards. The few that meet those standards earn my trust and loyalty. But if you’re hoping to use personal data successfully, there are a few things you have to get right.
I also did some negotiation in a nearby market for some old military badges from the 1930′s and was happy with the outcome! The hostel I was meant to stay in had overbooked, so they arranged for me to stay nearby in Hostel Sofia – the first hostel in Sofia after communist times. It is an old apartment converted into a hostel (as many are in East Europe) – this was a clean and quirky place, run by a middle-aged Bulgarian couple. The next day I went to Hostel Mostel - nice place, but busier and lacked that same character – should have stayed in the other. The main reason I didn’t, was that I wanted to do a tour organised by Hostel Mostel to the Rila Monastery, a UNESCO World Heritage Site (founded in the 10th century, it was destroyed by fire at the beginning of the 19th century and rebuilt 1834-1862), which is 2 hours south of Sofia in the Rila Mountains – it is the main tourist destination in Bulgaria.
tap
Then when we got home, we harvested another big bowl of kale from the garden - so tonight's dinner will be a stir fry of kale, bok choy, onion, garlic, and chicken - with a cucumber salad on the side. I'm hungry already!!
And the list could go on, and on, and on....
Frenchy: "......"
But still I must
Alyssa: No, Mom. I want some sweat, I want to be healthy too.
Which is better? Why does it seem there is always that decision? Is it possible to have both? Is it possible to be happy even if you know that you have not done the things you originally set out to do?
I learned a lot and am so glad I've read it.
The last few days have included several great reminders of why I love literature so much! In addition to completing a “modern classic” last week (Watership Down by Richard Adams; see my review), I’ve come across several other articles and books about the importance of good literature. Here are a few:
Oh and when you are done in the forums.. don't forget to head on over to the shop and pick up an awesome bargain.. and don't forget to use the sale code NEWYEAR30 during check out and you will get yourself 30% off your order. Already awesome prices and a further 30% off who wouldn't want to shop at these prices. I know I have!
Ten years after his wife and daughter are brutally murdered, a man (Butler) embarks on a flashy killing spree to extract vengeance not only on the killers, but also on the ambitious district attorney who let his concern over conviction rates supersede the pursuit of justice (Foxx) and on the entire court system. However, even after he has been caught and put in isolation in a maximum security prison, the murders continue in ever-more brutal and elaborate ways.
“Everything at rest, dusk: a bird calls,
We were given white walls when we moved in, but immediately painted them a neutral shade. Too bad it was just a shade wrong and turned a puke color at certain times of the day depending on the light. So, a couple of months ago when the half wall was built and the wood panel in the entry was replaced we decided to repaint the entire space from the living room all the way through to our back door - it's nearly the same shade...but no more puke yellow tones popping up. Thank goodness. I'm sure my husband would have objected to a third re-paint in as many years. I find wall paint a very finicky business to get the 'perfect shade'. Don't you?
19Even now my witness is in heaven, and the supporter of my cause is on high.
And that makes me very happy!
Fields was found wounded about 1 a.m. Friday, Clark was found in a street about an hour later, and Allen was discovered in the yard of a funeral home about 8:30 a.m., though investigators believe he was shot much earlier.
It allows you to scroll your way through a complete A-Z of the show and explore and search thousands of entries by series or episode. You will discover the Doctor’s fiercest enemies, closest allies and key places and objects and have the opportunity to preview and buy those must-have episodes.
Flight #2 we planned to fly to our hotel about 10 km away. Not a super long flight, but in Mexico they like to plant power lines in the most unlikely places which really limits your landing options. Add a bunch of fields in crop & it makes the flight much more interesting. Since we were ready for a great flight of course we hit sink all the way to the regular landing zone. Well...ALMOST all the way. At 200 meters over the ground I saw a tractor working & made a last-ditch effort to fly over & hope he was kicking off a thermal. There was a tiny beep, but a beep just the same. I worked that little patch of lift to over 1000 meters higher! Nothing feels as good as a low save, I swear. Derek & a few others saw me zoom up & hurried over and soon we all flew towards the hotel.
In Oregon,we had a very long rainy winter,and I was really missing the sun,so I would play this song and sing it to remind me the sun would reappear again.And it got me thinking about how the lyrics can apply to a lot of things in life,relationships,jobs,dreams....
banner on the right. I love the dimension on this page and
I am of course also reading Buddhist literature as part of my ongoing practice. The book stores here are loaded with the books which otherwise are hard to get, and I have bought many already. I am not going to share any lines as most of them include old and secret teaching that each person has to find when they are ready for it and transmitted in a direct way. I do want to mention that my absolute favorite and daily read right now is the Dakini Teachings, a book given to me in a special moment and therefore brought into my live this way. Here some items just from the glossary. The definitions are new to me and intriguing, Buddhist or not:
Earlier during the hearing, Smith faced the families and said he didn’t expect them to forgive him, but hoped to be given the chance to get on with his life.
Into an ear unwilling to hear
Gold Gel pen
Stay tuned for future gardening endeavors!
10 AM. In an hour my younger son graduates from grammar school. He’s the “boy who took the subway by himself” last year and made headlines worldwide, but last night he was just a boy desperately poking me at about 3 AM, trying not to wake his father up.
Other Posts :
Progress versus protection. Are the fish worth more than the gold? What of the property rights of a miner whose family has owned the land for almost eighty years? Weighty issues our nation has wrestled with throughout its history.
Some international analysts agree. Vicken Cheterian, a journalist and political analyst who works for the non-profit governance organization CIMERA, based in Geneva, says that "Georgia's military plans reveal its ambition to reclaim the territories of Abkhazia and South Ossetia it lost in the wars of the early 1990s."
Embroidery floss in the same two colors as your felt.
The idea of the compound itself is impressive. Bodeen was very generous with the details of how this compound was even possible. The different scenarios that could potentially cause a problem for people in such a situation. Oxygen, food, water, waste, etc. It's all explained to an extent and it even made such a thing seem possible. Creepy, no?
Get excited!!! We are!!! :)
Gotcha Mathilda da wikked bitch NL
But this is a gross underestimation and their focus on winning over Tory voters offers up some opportunities for other parties. The Lib Dems have been a growing party since birth. The Tories have sought to stem this growth by moving into liberal territory. Labour did not and so most of our new voters were Labour voters – some of whom have returned to Labour. However, many are ‘undecided’ as they don’t like Labour or the Tories and are now not sure about the Lib Dems. So what should the Lib Dems do in this new battle for conservative voters?
This time. Now that he knows more.
How has it changed you?
The Outsider
A FAILED STRATEGY FOR LABOR
I learned something through this musical reflection. I learned that while it is from our mothers that we learn how to love, it is from our fathers that people gain their identity. More importantly, it is from God the Father that we gain the fullness of our identity as he allows us the right measures of winning and losing in this life.
Non-Catholics … even if they might be forgiven of their sins … have no particularly effective, specific way of replenishing the grace that was lost through sin … something which could leave them at a serious spiritual disadvantage.
What an absurd analogy!!! Cutting the baby down the middle? I dare any member of any school board in this great Commonwealth to show me where cuts are being made to harm any child in any regard whether physically or through loss of personnel. I submit that the Department of Education be dismantled and that control over education be returned to the states.
Last week of the school holidays this week and as I type the girls are bustling round helping to sort bags etc ready for going back to school. They've loved the time off but they are both pleased to be going back, Meg especially missed her school friends as we live outside the catchment. And as it's only 3 short weeks till bank holiday weekend it's not going to seem that long till we get another break.
Her sights and sounds; dreams happy as her day;
"Any arrests?" I asked.
I won’t deny.
Andrew: Based in SA – having a solid fan base. Would love a van base in Australia & Canada so that we can tour there for 3/4 months a year.
The course of lies that built her years
The following year I began waiting tables at a restaurant and within no time - you guessed it! I started packing on the pounds because I was eating like that was my job. My clothes were busting at the seams and my sister was walking around in a bikini with a perfect body and perfect hair. I suddenly had a fat roll, big bangs and glasses...
I can’t seem to beat my inner evil, the deep desire for what is wrong
I said, to one in my best teacher voice, “you shouldn’t be running in here.”
The Proposal
I guess I'll start with the weather, because that's lame. But yes, it's already titty-sweat hot here in the Heart O' Texas. Yeah, I said it. I am sticky 90% of the day because of the 90% humidity. GRUMPY!!
“SPRING” (New Life, Green, Melting Snow, Pleasant Weather,…) is the topic for this Thursday’s photo challenge I love the vibrant blooms on the trees and riot of colors in every garden and roundabout, the soft shades of green that spring brings with it.
Pick 3: Vikings
So here is 3, their third and final record. Less rocky than the previous album C, it's perhaps the band's essence of beauty in one encompassing package. If I had found this in 1997, when it came out, I don't think I would have appreciated it nearly as much. "Balloon" finds me hitting the repeat button over and over; other tracks reek (in a good way) of Red Red Meat and other Tim Rutili/Califone sounds. Chicago guitar dude Bundy K. Brown plays on a track or two (he known primarily for Tortoise and the other John McEntire scene bands) too.
I packed our son’s lunch and saw him off to with the usual motherly advice, “Vern, drive careful now!”
If you look closely, you'll see a current resident has affixed a "Stop Atlantic Yards" sign to the door.
The cool thing is that all the process is really green: SoupCycle buys the organic vegetables from local farmers, make the soup, load it onto a bicycle and deliver it to you.
hello~ it's day 1 of ACEN!
Happy end of the weekend, you all!
I didn't realize when I picked the date that I was going to 1) be hired at LTF as the coordinator (it was still up in the air) and 2) have a mandatory expo that day.
One of our final year product design technology students has been working on turning a concept into reality for his final major project on reducing the cost of wind turbines. Clive has provided us with an insight into his project and the progress he has made so far.
"Yes, it is the crisis" I tell Mithu as I leave. Whispers of redundancies are getting louder, but until it truly strikes I'll continue to do my bit to support quality, independance and imagination. I work in the largely soulless area around Opera and despite talk of downturns, the chain restaurants serving up reheated preprepared frozen identikit meals are still just as busy. McDonalds are also taking the opportunity in these troubled times to expand whilst low-cost supermarkets are also thriving. People cannot be blamed for cutting back on spending, but who are the victims at the end of the long chain? The true crisis will be when the economy picks up again but we find that such independant, talented free spirits have disappeared from the city.
The lovely young lady in the photo is 5 feet 10 inches tall, and almost all legs so the sock looks like a knee sock on her, and is!
Lose focus, push out in the wrong direction, and the light spread out into a field, dimmer near danger, but too even and broad for him to tell where Taslin was. He struggled forward, wanting to look down at his feet - the floor felt uneven, treacherous - but knowing that was the surest way to lose contact with the Sherim and fall out, right next to the Axtli.
For if our kings and princes were to agree, and stand by one another and help one another, and the Christian man were to pray for them, I should be undismayed and of good hope; the Turk would leave his raging and find in Emperor Charles a man who was his equal. Failing that, if things are to go as they now go, and no one is in agreement with another or loyal to another, and everyone wants to be his own man and takes the field with a beggarly array, I must let it go at that. Of course I will gladly help pray, but it will be a weak prayer, for I can have little faith that it will be heard, bemuse of the childish, presumptuous, and shortsighted way in which such great enterprises are undertaken, knowing that it is tempting God and that He can have no pleasure in it.
My thanks to all of you who shared your goals and dreams for 2012.
This is where things get murky. I’m always on the hunt for That One True Thing that “Is Good,” whether it’s in relation to eating habits, exercise, my hair, how much I drive, and so on to infinity. Sometimes I get so caught up in looking for this one ultimate example (spending hours and hours researching weightlifting programs, buying a hair dryer even though I hate them with a passion) that I forget a couple very important things:
DT: I'm going to say Terry Pratchett. Asides from the fact that I'm sure he'd be good company, I can't think of any writer, save perhaps King, who's struck such a balance between popular success, critical approval and tending to his own writerly needs. Long after the point where the Discworld should have got tired, long after the point where he ever needed to work again, you can tell Pratchett's still loving what he's doing.
Observation:
3. After lunch, go see The Big Year with Joe, at whichever theater was available when we had finished my birthday lunch with Mom and Dad.
He wasn’t popular. He came to save. He came to love. And no one cared. Jesus was the trickster. Jesus wasn’t “the safe cause.”
I love planning and organizing family events from picnics in the park to themed birthdays. They are only kids for a short time and I want them to have amazing childhood memories. Too soon they will be racing to a practice or a date, battling teenage hormones, or trekking off to college and we will not have the opportunity to relish in their childhoods and live it to its fullest. This “party” was inexpensive, fun-filled, and most importantly, a memory maker.
Artwork: 4.3/5 - As you read the manga, we see that Sakisaka Io has made subtle changes in her style. The characters definitely become more good-looking and harbours a fluffy feel. I must say that her monochrome pages are more appealing compared to her colour pages (typical of manga artists). Sakisaka-sensei’s artwork is very recognizable and I have grown to love it more and more. The scenes are laid-out so well which enhances the touching and cute sensation the manga delivers.
I used to work with a chap who'd been a Poor Law Relieving Officer for the City of Nottingham. He told stories about the corpses of suicides being washed up on the banks of the River Trent. This meant that the ensuing funeral would have to be paid for by the Nottingham City Poor Law Commissioners, coming out of this chap's budget.
Soy sauce (optional)
Not my favorite one...It seems plain and I'm not sure why...any how this is one is for my mom. I'm going to make one more...and then I'm done.
Actually, I think that Ted and Marshall would be a great couple.
A few weeks back I found out I either needed to be looking for a new place to live or take over the lease in my current place and find someone to move in eventually.
6. A New Machine Part 1 (01:33)
the book explains how we each have an imaginary bucket.
He referred to the dates on her tombstone
One Path pleasing God
Answer: Priscilla. Although my daughter and her friends call her Drazilla. Who knows why. Priscilla wasn't funny and odd enough?
What Emma didn’t see coming was stumbling upon the cute new kid, Eric, in the graveyard. Eric having a conversation with an old woman in rags. The old woman offering Emma a gift that doesn’t appear to be real…Until the headaches start, until Emma starts to see ghosts, until Emma becomes a Necromancer…until Eric divulges that he’s bound to kill her…
01-02 Alchemist BEST OF DRAGON VOLUME III, WHITE DWARF 20
i used hot glue gun on the "nickel" piece and pressed my flower into in lightly.
Illustrations: photo of Carlos Ramirez,’the jackel’, terrorist photo of Libyans during Chad invasion photo of Estate of Edwin Wilson in Virginia photo of Edwin Wilson photo of Muammar el-Qaddafiin 1976 photo of Frank Terpil, Kevin Mulcahy, Sven Hoffelner photo of Kevin Mulcahy in disguise in 1977 photo of Mulcahy in Washington
More of the same, as the comic is in great shape at the moment.
It's what we choose to do and how we choose to act
City Room reports that New York will use a whopping $45 million to fix up the Gothic Brownstone Central Park Police Station at the 86th Street Traverse Road. This is welcome news, since the 19th century building is looking rather bedraggled.
On March 3, 1703, a very short giant died, and a greater one of average height may well have laughed to hear the news.
09. The Third Reich & Roll - The Residents (1976)
Dear GT,
But who is going?
3) The third thing is southern tolerance. Unlike the Baniya’s, the southern Brahmin’s vegetarianism isn’t oppressive. The intolerant and insular Gujaratis and Marwaris of Malabar Hill have banished all meat from their neighbourhoods. There is little sign of such horror of pork and beef eaters around where I live. This may be because the area is not a traditional Brahmin neighbourhood. But generally speaking, the Gujarati’s fanaticism against meat is absent.
Pat down the loaf with your palm and fingers so that it flattens out a bit (just a bit). Apply your egg yolk wash with a pastry brush. Cut the loaf into 10 equally-sized pieces. Put onto an ungreased cookie sheet. Repeat with other quarters of dough and filling. Place in a preheated moderate oven for about 30 minutes, until the tops are a rich, golden brown.
You are to make a 2 page layout. It can be double sided or two side by side pages.
I have to say, I thought that it was a nice idea from the moment I read about it, but it was really amazing to see it in action once we were on "set." The photo shoot was held at a private residence in San Diego. The staff could not have been more nice or more welcoming. I am seriously an even bigger fan of Infantino products now that I have met the incredibly sweet and sincere people behind the brand. And it was something else to see so many babies playing together and interacting... different shades and abilities... each shining in their own way... parents visiting and proud of their little ones. It was really a neat day.
Or will you respond with, “Well a REAL man would know!”
That phrase, “I’m not normal.”
Targeting restaurants? Try to avoid calling restaurant owners during the breakfast, lunch or dinner rush when the owners have the least amount of time to talk.
Pendragon: Dispatch the assassins?
This weekend, my Mother of Twins Club had their Spring tag sale and I was a seller for the second time. I didn't have too much but was eager to rid of some baby items as well as a plethora of plastic toys that my parents dump on me with each of their weekly visits. The sale is quite the undertaking and sellers have to set up Friday night and work from 6am Saturday morning until about 3pm that afternoon. In my absence, Daddy and Auntie Kim stepped in to look after the kiddos - Kim in charge of Matteo and Daddy with Sebastian and Collette.
"We have asked Catholics to seriously reflect and pray about the ramifications for current and future generations of legislation which completely redefines marriage," Bishop Prowse said.
1) So now I know where The White Stripes got their name (and theme!).
Current n-body simulations (remember "orbit7"?) have shown it'd be pretty likely for an early Earth to accrue Trojans. These are essentially mini-planetesimals which orbit at the same distance from the Sun as a parent body (in this case, the early Earth), but at Lagrangian points 60 degrees ahead and 60 degrees behind the parent body's position in its orbit. We've actually seen tons of asteroids 60 degrees ahead and 60 degrees behind Jupiter, but in the same orbit.
Alison was born in Honolulu, Hawaii, graduated from Ball State University and spent most of her life in Bloomington, Ind. She is survived by her mother, Ruth Cochran, and all five of her siblings: Robert, Mary, Steve, Emily and the Reverend Sarah Cochran. Other survivors include her children, Rebecca Townsend and Ryan Wilson, her granddaughter, Jasmine Townsend, son-in-law Clyde Townsend, and husband, Chris Little. A memorial service will be held at 4 p.m., Thurs., Feb. 18, at the Unitarian Universalist Church at 2120 N. Fee Lane in Bloomington. In lieu of flowers, memorial contributions can be sent to Harmony School (909 E. 2nd Street Bloomington 47401) or Heartwood (PO Box 1011, Alton, IL 62002).
If I earn enough annually, I pay taxes. That's a big if. Children's authors generally, as has been said here and elsewhere, do not earn a lot from books, despite the JK Rowling misconception that some people have of us, and have to 'top up' their income with school visits etc. (Strangely enough, the JK Rowling idea goes hand in hand with the 'real world' perception that all children's book authors do is write about fluffy bunnies in a dilettante sort of way. Which is partly why I'm writing this piece. But I digress.) I pay my website designer and Computer Guy (when I can afford to). I buy office supplies, books to keep up with my industry, for research, for reviewing on the blog (that's a lot of books, thus contributing to other authors' incomes - and yes, I visit the library too). There are other things, too boring to enumerate here. It may not be much, but even a little is better than nothing.
2 Tbs key lime juice
When I can, I love taking another coffee break in the afternoon, while I chill with Dr. Phil or with a good book or some fun blog surfing.
Here's to a good, sweet new year. Leave the chickens alone. ___________________________
Today's project is what I like to call "on-the-fly"...meaning I had a random thought to make it, then sat down and fifteen minutes later it was done. Not a lot of thought, which can sometimes be the projects that are the most fun.
~ Pencils (sparkly ones)
to go so deeply into studio-mastery, she's done hardly any
That may have involved tigers.
A lot of times there are just people in your life, where you can have fun with but you can’t really get into the serious side, be it for the lack of intimacy, trust, or a misfit of personalities.
As for the staying hydrated? Didn’t quite accomplish that. Gotta work on that one. I don’t really have any excuses: I have a great 1 litre water bottle that I keep in the bag I take to school. Just got to remember to use it.
Weighing in at 5 pounds 12 ounces at birth, she’s so little, but not as teeny as I actually anticipated!
Style: Trappist Belgian Pale Ale
" ... We are offering an efficient service to help you and your colleagues ensure that your academic and professional work is written in perfect English. We will check the grammar and style of your work and return it to you to meet your requirements and deadlines.
And allowing me to give away another insole proves two things about Ortholite. They are certainly rather generous and they clearly do not read this blog.
“We broke the Taliban’s momentum. We’ve built strong Afghan security forces. We devastated al Qaeda’s leadership, taking out over 20 of their top 30 leaders. And one year ago, from a base here in Afghanistan, our troops launched the operation that killed Osama bin Laden. The goal that I set — to defeat al Qaeda, and deny it a chance to rebuild — is within reach,” Obama said. “Here, in the pre-dawn darkness of Afghanistan, we can see the light of a new day on the horizon.”
You get the picture—it really is a time of year when we pause to appreciate our relationship, the gift God gave each of us when He gave us to each other!
Dungeon Siege 2 (PC)
This book also introduces the reader to several interesting secondary characters as well. I just hope that the reader gets to know them better in future books. I realize that, as a first book, the author has to introduce not only the characters but this fantastical new world. I would just love more back story about the characters that surround Jack. Skerren's past was mentioned but I would have loved to have Skerren describe what happened to him to make him so jaded.
Southern Star Logger
Nevermind that the heat index for the District on Friday is 120 degrees — lawmakers will be sweating in their Washington offices as the clock ticks down toward a possible U.S. default.
mabey she has chkikin strip for me?
I was going to wait until lunchtime, but on second thought, I think I will eat my chicken salad sandwich now.
Burns and gashes mark my body.
My College Play was barely born
Time: 10 am
ah~
We stalled. It stalled. I stalled it. Whatever. That’s OK, because in a normal vehicle what you do is; put on the handbrake. Find the “bite” with the accelerator and clutch. Release the handbrake. Drive off.
While some families hold the secret to the fluffiest matzoh balls in town, others have created new traditions to share with their families and friends.
It's a cute video featuring the song 'W H A L E' by Yellow Ostrich to
Many years ago I worked for Charles Schwab Inc. while in Denver, Co. People (family, friends, etc.)were constantly telling me how privileged/fortunate I was since Schwab had such high values and cared about the common folk. The implication was that Schwab was the best house on the street since that was how Schwab was marketed. How would I know to think otherwise- I was recently out of college. My father had invested with Schwab since the dawn of the operation when they were in Sacramento http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_Schwab_Corporation and they seemed to honestly care about making everyone an investor so they could obtain part of the American dream. In fact, at the time I worked there, Schwab was the darling of San Francisco and anyone with an inkling of liberalism.
Finally, the series shifts back to Sawako and Kazehaya after the Chizuru story comes to a close as Christmas is here and Kazehaya suggest that they should hold a Christmas party for all the single students in their classroom, which is the majority of them. Sawako wants to go but she can’t quite bring herself to ask her parents since her father is excited about having a little family Christmas. However, Kazehaya wants to see her but will that alone be enough for Sawako to tell her parents she wants to spend the holiday with her friends and Kazehaya?
I am delighted that one of the chosen charities is Riding for Disabled. Some 30,000 people benefit each year from the 500 centres across UK with the help of 18,000 volunteers. But for every one person who takes part, there are four on a waiting list, the charity urgently needs to expand. As a volunteer, I have first hand experience of how beneficial horse riding is to the adults and children who come to the centre. Riding strengthens the spine and legs, but also develops overall muscle tone and has body wide benefits.
Aside from the dispute on Spratly Islands, this news has been emerging and quite aggressively there have been a standoff on the waters of Scarborough Shoal. If only these countries (including the Philippines) have to agree on certain terms, together, there will be peace among them. Which leads me to question, will this disputed island/islands be resolved or will this instigate war in the future generations? What if, the tension goes stronger and stronger and the bullying becomes more and more aggressive? What’s gonna happen?
Along with 42% of the UK population, I have said many times that I want to leave the EU as it currently configured with all speed, and refocus our marketing efforts towards Asia…where the potential is far greater (and the bureaucracy less stifling) than in Europe. But equally, the Geopolitics can’t be ignored: as we stand in November 2011, the United Kingdom is an irrelevance to the EU. The last thing Britain needs is the rise, fall and rise again of a dangerously unstable SuperState on its doorstep.
Hi everyone! Daniella here from Dress, Design & Decor and so happy to be sharing a few of my favourite things from home today. I have yet to decorate (decisions, decisions...) but I'm a huge fan of crisp, clean white so it's quite suiting for now!
Yet I must add… All my life I have read, followed, looked for and searched for streetart as almoust a need of oxygen to all that makes me feel we live in a corrupt hopeless world were people have the value of ATM machines and are defined, loved and searched based on the amount of money they can actually see spitting out of their creditcards.
We all have to wrestle with the truth of this matter in our hearts. Personally, I find it much more helpful to see what the Bible is arguing for, rather than what it is arguing against. Those who are currently affected by some Christians’ negative stance towards gays and lesbians should perhaps also seek comfort in the much greater preponderance in the Bible of messages of inclusion, acceptance, tolerance and understanding.
And an all time favorite-
But I have a card to show you today. It is from the latest release from Teddy Bo and I have made a birthday card for one of Gabriella's friends.
“There’s a lot of room for creativity,” Keyser says. “A lot of room for breaking boundaries, a lot of room for making music that sounds nothing like a video game and everything like your favorite punk band or everything like your favorite dubstep act or anything like that.”
Tilsit
I mentioned before that there was more to the story than just a simple plague/post plague rebuilding premise. The other part of the story, which in some sense is probably what the story is really about, is the idea of good versus evil. In the process of recovering and rebuilding after the virus has run its course, there are two main people that serve as figureheads. The first is Mother Abigail, a 106 year old woman living in Nebraska. Several people have dreams about her and are drawn to her home. Eventually she and her followers move to Colorado. They form what would be considered the “good” side. On the other side is Randal Flagg. He sets up his main base in Las Vegas (fitting, right?) and his group is what would be considered the “bad” side. Although, there is really no reason why either group is good or bad, other than because of the particular figure head they aligned with, and of course, in some cases, the past actions of those people give a little insight into why they may have aligned with their particular leader.
Get to know contacts in the media who will help you get noticed by guiding you through the proper channels. Did you know that many communities have public access television stations that have talk shows that feature local people and businesses? Their audiences are usually small, but it's a great way to get practice before the cameras so that you'll be ready when your big break comes. And you never know who will be watching and what breaks can come from a local appearance.
From chapter one, where she “unbecomes” a gardener, you know that the woman who wrote this book loves her land. And not really just the land that she and her husband own properly, but the American landscape as it used to be before everyone decided they needed English gardens surrounding their homes. Her attitude is one that New England should look like New England and California should look like California - it’s what made our country so appealing in the first place.
Maybe I subconsciously feel that coming back to SL might affect me in a negative way. SL can suck you in and time seems to fly much faster, as if two hours in RL equal half an hour in SL. I don’t want to “officially” leave SL, I am still too attached to my avatar for that, plus I am thinking of all the Lindens I invested! LOL. But I will officially go on an extended break. There might be a blog entry, or there might be none, and maybe bad weather in autumn will drive me back to the always sunny virtual world. But when I am honest with myself, maybe I don’t want to get that fascination with SL back after all and rather hold on to RL. We’ll see.
But the drugs are not cheap, with the NHS in England spending around £47million a year on medicines to fight obesity.
It is FREEING to be able to say what you mean and mean what you say. A person does not need to be rude or mean, just direct and honest. I find that I am respected more when individuals know that they can count on me to be honest with them. They depend on that no-nonsense conversation. I also find that I feel happier when I am able to be honest, because I am living life in an authentic way.
These bags have been all over the internet on different blogs. Please keep in mind that I have not used a sewing machine since high school (and we don't need to discuss how long ago that was). I thought for my first attempt this was pretty good. :) All you do is cut scallop squares out of fabric with the Big Shot. Put a piece of batting between two squares and sew them together with a quick X. Then you sew the squares together to form a bag. The handles are some of our awesome ribbon.
Parsley for garnishing
Dead Kennedys California über alles US
There are many other free anti virus software out there. Not all of them are however, good enough to provide proper security to computers. Some free anti virus software do not come with advanced detection technologies and therefore, may fail to detect different variants of viruses. Such free anti virus software are not simply worth anything. If you are planning to get a free anti virus, it is important you do some homework on the software. Check the reviews of other users to find out how good, in reality, the free anti virus software is before you start trusting it wholeheartedly!
As, in full view of the world, the crown of the tree unfolds and spreads in time and space, so with his work.
That said, Navarro, too, acknowledged interest in amendments that limit the duration and/or affected age range of the youth curfew – but those late-breaking developments hadn’t earned her support yet.*
Kessler, a foodie and admitted wine guy, has become a dedicated follower of American IPAs, and his ability to detect intriguing aromas and flavors, such as “bergamot” or “like the taste of a burnt raisin on the side of a metal pan,” delighted the beer geeks. McClure, the lone professional brewer, offered musings on how a particular beer might have been made. Farrell, who teaches beer appreciation and evaluation courses, kept the group focused on the sensory basics of a good IPA.
But is this how the apostles and early Christians understood the expression “sit at my right hand”? No! Among many ancient peoples, the imagery of a king sitting on the throne of his God was a common way to express that the king ruled with the approval and support of his God, and this is consistent with how early Christians understood this phrase. (See The Gentile Times Reconsidered, 3rd Ed. , Carl Olof Jonsson, Commentary Press, 1998, pg 264-270.)
I recommend The Wedding Organizer by russell + hazel that I co-authored, but if you visit your local book store you can see a sample of other organizers by Martha Stewart Weddings, Emily Post, Mindy Weiss (available Jan 15th) and theknot.
“Affirmative, sir,” Tanner nodded. “I’ve only been there twice but I remember it well enough. Didn’t we have a former team member on leave in the area before the crash?”
It is nearly two years since my last visit to Prvni Pivni Tramway. Pilsner Urquell is still available together with Primator's wheat beer. In addition to this, there is a rotating tap system, where several smaller Czech breweries are represented.
CHiMPS’s compiler analyses automatically generate the caches from C source. The solution allows scientific programmers to retain their familiar programming environment and memory model, and at the same time provides performance that is on average 7.8x greater and power that is one fourth that of a CPU executing the same source code. The CHiMPS work has been published in the International Symposium on Computer Architecture (ISCA, 2009), the International Conference on Field Programmable Logic and Applications (FPL, 2008), and High-Performance Reconfigurable Computing Technology and Applications (HPRCTA, 2008), where it received the Best Paper Award.
Sarah Bargo
Like most guilds, our guild makes a bed size quilt each year. The members take home block kits and complete blocks and a couple members put it together and send it off to another member who does the long arm quilting on it. The quilt then begins travelling in the fall to other Guilds and shows in the area and raffle tickets are sold. It's called an 'Opportunity Quilt'. A percentage of the proceeds go to charity (most guilds are nonprofit), the rest goes to programs and the materials to create the quilt for the next year. When the quilt is done, every member is given 2 packs of tickets that they are expected to sell (as a minimum). When I get mine, I just write a check for the cost of the tickets, put my name on the back of the stubs (because the seller of the winning ticket gets a prize), and turn the tickets and my check in....usually on the same night they handed me the tickets.
I had two wishes for Mother's Day: a new garage door opener (I'm nothing if not practical) and to try the cupcakes at Sugar Mountain Bake Shoppe. So on the Saturday before Mother's Day, while my husband and 16-year-old son worked on the garage door, my younger son and I headed to the trendy Park Avenue area to pick out cupcakes.
GINGRICH: Why did we describe him that way?
Physicians hold a position of great respect in American society, so much so that alleging malpractice is treated as welcome as migraine headache on one’s wedding day. Little else is held so anathema.
That is why the 275 sailors, prisoners and soldiers were desperate. They had no hope and they were given a God-given premonition of that which was to come; to fall into the hands of a living God. We read in Hebrews 10:31 that “It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of a living God.”
If you want some, contact SeanMike directly. I hear he'll do just about anything in exchange for a case of Miller Lite.
“It is hard to sneak around and do what you want, I have done it a couple of times. But you know one fantasy I have, and the Secret Service they keep looking at me because they think I might actually do it, is to walk right out the front door and just keep walking.”
Our growth in Christ, must not become stale. Forget what is behind you. Don’t just forget your failures, but forget your successes. Clinging to these things will keep you from continuing on in Christ. Have you achieved something great in Christ? It is nothing now. You must press on. Not just for your sake, but for the entire Body of Christ.
Compagnie du Ponant hosts cruises that depart from the southernmost tip of Argentina to Antarctica. A cruise starts at about US$10,000 and lasts for about 10 days.
How you’re against the death penalty and why. For all your faults, Tru, you’re
Did you guys have any problems getting the stuff out in stores?
I never knew that scrubbing a rug could bring so much clarity. It didn't take me long to realize that I had really messed up. I needed grace, and I needed it bad. I told God I was sorry. I told the kids I was sorry and asked for their forgiveness, which they were quick to give. I cuddled the dog and told her "sins forgiven." (Yes, that's what we have to tell her when she's no longer in trouble...you can tell she's a preacher's dog.)
And if God does not even seem to answer Jesus’ prayer what chance do we stand of being saved from our agony?
Here’s what to do…
I’ve been going through a lot lately and the one thing that is in my control to fix, I can’t seem to fix at all. Makes me feel like the most useless entity in this planet, yes I feel even more useless than a discarded toothpick smothered in saliva and remnants of last night’s steak dinner. Okay that was gross.
This travel guide celebrates the Slow philosophy of embracing all that is local, natural, traditional, sensory and gratifying.
I am crafty in many ways, but I have never actually completed a scrapbook.I get all jazzed and buy a bunch of scrapbooking stuff and then it all collects dust in my basement closet.
The early summer heat, that pressed upon spring, melting snowdrops while tempting many magnolia blooms to cast off their protective calyx-armor, parted, as suddenly as it came and left us cold . . . dipping into temperatures of low 20's F.
Corps Headquarters XXVIII Army Corps
Is your beef 100% grass-fed?
The book is told from the perspective of a college senior who is a newly professed Christian, Kat Davies, part of the time, and from an elementary school prinicipal and long-time Christian and church leader, Avis Douglass, the other part. Kat is very enthusiastic about life, living "green" and her new found Christian faith. Kat discovers Souled Out Community Church and introduces herself to Avis and longs to become a part of the multi-cultural church and to be close to Avis, a woman whom she greatly admires. However, Avis is going through some hard times in her life at the moment; including a strained relationship with her daughter and the unknown of her and her husband's job status. She thinks Kat is very eccentric and nosy and does not want to be bothered by her. Kat is almost the complete oppostie of Avis and yet God put them in each other's paths for a reason. Their lives keep intertwining in ways neither of them would have expected but God knows what He is doing!
Councillor Brian Coleman ignored all wise counsel in order to introduce these policies. He ignored all efforts to mitigate the problems caused.As a result, we have a situation where ever more parking restrictions will be required to fix a problem that did not previously exist.
The colour palette of sunflower, flame, grape and blue is complimented by the summer clothes chosen by our stylist Sophie Rowell.
PostSecret is a blog that has captivated the interent for quite some time now. It has become the most visited add free website on the internet. Impressive right!
as well as his phone-set inside. Apparently, someone doesn’t want this guy to talk!
Carter is obviously attracted to Gallagher and dates him before spending a night with him. When Gallagher’s troubled friend Teresa Perron (Melinda Dillion), a devout Catholic, comes forward to tell Carter that Gallagher was with her, helping her with an abortion, at the time the labour union leader, Carter thinks nothing of printing up the story for another page one byline, despite Perron telling her that she doesn’t want her name in the papers.
that lie lost in the deep clouds
1 reverberation
while you skim the surface, the glare in darkness,
MOVIE QUOTE: Dr. Rick Marshall: If you don’t make it, it’s your own damn “vault.” That’s a bitch slap of truth right there.
Hooray for surprises that walk my way
I have let go of the notion that I can still "guide" my daughters;
Today I went for my run and then headed up to the church to help with the prayer room. The run was good but I slept like crap so it was slow and hard. I kept it just under five miles to be sweet to my tired body.
Scalloped Border: Martha Stewart Birthday Cake Art Cricut cartridge cut at 1 1/4" (I think -- I forgot to write it down.)
The pictures of the final cake didn't turn out so good, it was so dark and I didn't have time to play with the camera, so I'll take what I've got :)
“I need to say I’m pretty happy because the car was so competitive since the first lap. Fernando did a better start than me but I was just following the pace and it was so great. It’s my first podium and my first victory and you can imagine what I feel.”
Sari
Yet another fascinating aspect of yawning is the relationship between yawning and stretching, also called ‘pandiculation’. In humans as well as in animals, yawning is invariably accompanied by stretching upon waking up after sleeping, but almost never before falling asleep.
Nate Freiman hit .288 in 138 games played with the Lake Elsinore Storm. He went 158-for-548 with 35 doubles, 4 triple, 22 homers, 81 runs scored and 111 RBI in 2011. In 2010 he was named mid-season all-star in the Midwest League. Freiman was 1-3 and placed second in the homerun derby.
So he wrote to me. I had to explain to him that Dodgy Publisher--which had taken advantage of him in plenty of other ways--was actually having a stopped clock moment: its explanation was entirely correct, and although its contract terminology was deliberately confusing, there was no breach. It was painful to take Dodgy's side, but in this case I had to do it.
- ‘Now may the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in believing, that you may abound in hope by the power of the Holy Spirit’ Romans 15:13 NKJV
The built environment generally is changing to accommodate larger Americans. New York’s commuter trains are considering new cars with seats able to hold 400 pounds. Blue Bird is widening the front doors on its school buses so wider kids can fit. And at both the new Yankee Stadium and Citi Field, home of the New York Mets, seats are wider than their predecessors by 1 to 2 inches.
But I’m not holding my breath.
In terms of recent American politics there has been very little if any involvement by young attractive female celebrities that are able to add sex appeal to any cause they endorse. Just as these celebrities can add sex appeal to endorsing a product like beer or some fashion apparel, and actually cause the masses of people to buy the product, their endorsement of a political cause is so powerful that it can cause millions to buy an idea just as they would buy a product. When during the 2008 campaign Paris Hilton fired back at John McCain for comparing Obama to her, Obama proceeded to use Hilton’s main theme which labeled McCain as being old and out of touch. A few months after the Hilton commercials, McCain’s people were apologizing and begging for a retraction from Hilton, yet it was too late, Obama was already ahead in the polls and her attacks against McCain stuck, people came to see him as being old and out of touch and Obama as being young and representative of the new generation. Sex appeal was very clear in Hilton’s commercials as she did them in a 2 piece bikini. Than Paris Hilton proceeded to exit her political themes as they no longer served her brand, and instead jumped on the Angelina Jolie band wagon adding sex appeal to charitable causes which contribute to humanitarian efforts world-wide.
Okay, so I do not have much control over this.
The food isn’t even half of it though, like I mentioned, the television sounds just awful. We get a glimpse of it over here on certain channels, but that shit is avoidable. If you don’t feel like checking out America’s finest exports, you have the comfort of changing channels and finding something a little less terrible. Which I suppose is easy with Jersey Shore being about as bad as it gets.
As you grow older you will discover that you have two hands;
Saturday is here! i can imagine to most of you say “hell yes! finally!” so honor of the holiday im gonna share an epic series with you. “Black Lagoon“
Many thanks to Gemma and her colleagues at YARN who did such a good job not only in putting such a thing together - but having the confidence in such a diverse range of performers, some, like me, they'd never met. I could well imagine a Manchester equivalent - anyone for "A Taste of Honey" or "A Clockwork Orange?"
Inks: Memento Bahama Blue, Danube Blue, Bamboo Leaves, Rich Cocoa, Ranger Distress Inks and copics
and intentions
Price In India :- Rs. 25900.
On our final afternoon of work, as D circled the room for the last time with brush in hand, I had to laugh. He'd pulled out a fine-tipped model from his days of taking watercolors on vacation with his parents to capture landscapes, birds, and bugs on paper. Now, he was dipping the brush in a tray of pale green latex paint, dabbing with painstaking strokes at imperfections along his caulk line. The tiny featherings of white paint that had bled through our taping job when we'd applied the last coat on the molding were in no way visible to me, but he wanted everything to be flawless.
I see the two of us,
I’ve let her words permeate my being, and they truly resonate with me. It’s likely that all people have all three, but may not be aware of what’s involved for them to be truly present.
You can thank Johnny Mercer for such romantic favorites as "Satin Doll" (co-written with Duke Ellington), "Moon River" (co-written with Henry Mancini), "Come Rain or Come Shine" (co-written with Harold Arlen), and "Too Marvelous for Words" (co-written with Richard Whiting).
Kayman is 16 now, wow, that was one of the hardest things ever letting him drive off on his birthday, we got him a truck and he loves it. He has a job at Sonic as a cook, I don't know that he loves it, but a huge insurance payment needs it! He played football and only had one injury, a concussion, but we all survived it. He is now practicing baseball and doing well.
“Jewish theology regards the union between a man a woman who are sexually and emotionally different from one another as a complementary covenant of friendship and intimacy, which forms the basis for procreation and childrearing. This is why Jewish law has so fervently opposed sexual relations between members of the same sex”, she explained, “and why the heterosexual family has played such a vital role throughout the ages in the transmission of Jewish values and the survival of the Jewish people.”
We are working without a net and there have been credible claims that two TUSD Governing Board members have told our district superintendent that any violations by teachers should be disciplined harshly and immediately. Thus, my colleagues and I feel that our jobs are very much on the line, and we have not been given any reassurance through specific criteria in curriculum and pedagogy of what is to be avoided and how we can confidently move forward with our students.
One final thought, people often talk about the importance of spending time with family during the holiday season. I personally think that family time is very important. However, I think that there are times that we get so caught up with our own family that we might forget that there are plenty of people out there who do not have any family, or will be away from their family for the holidays. So, why not reach out to them?
They LOVE their backpacks.
Then I had very good dances with several new partners--as well as those I'd had with the two leaders I already knew--and the long wait became worthwhile.
Depending on the size of your family, you may need to schedule anywhere from one to four loads of laundry/day. Start with two loads each day (Monday-Friday) and decide if you need to increase that number or not.
I could make this a post about legalizing marijuana and other narcotics and the hypocrisy related to the legality of the tobacco industry, but I’m sure you’ve already read those sorts of articles.
No bell, just a knocker. He clenches his fist to still the trembling and raps it, three times, smartly against the door. He tastes bile, his stomach spinning with tension, his whole body rigid as the door opens, safe on its security chain. A single eye peers up through the gap at him, a quiet voice, almost lost against the wind. “Daddy?”
"Take your power now."
Some nights the stray cats used the fat planters of rubber trees at Toots for a litter box and you had to run out of there squeezing your nose. Teen-aged tourists and gee-gawkers from the crowded peninsula drove out at dusk in their souped-up cars and drove the Capitola loop in search of sex or a proximate encounter in conversation.
For two weeks, about one hundred youth and some families came to Louisville. As our students here in YWAM leading them out in ministry in downtown areas. The participants found transformations in their own life, some accepted the Lord to their heart during their time here, and they slept on the floor, served tirelessly and blessed many others.
Indeed, we have noticed that many of you may feel angry or upset, and then go outside to the beautiful trees, water and air and begin to feel better and more Lighted. This is because each and every atom of Creation be it in the form of the beautiful elementals or otherwise, are sending you their Loving energies unconditionally in a beautiful Service-to-Others and Service-to-Humanity effort, for they want each and every one of you to feel as happy as they and we feel alike.
I am actually in the middle of shooting, a very interesting project made by an international group of filmmakers who have never met in person. The film, currently titled ‘Train Station’, connects dozens of short segments, each made by a different director, that together tell a single but multi-faceted story. My short segment is taking place in my hometown of Shanghai. My character is a drama queen in and out. This movie seems very promising and hopefully can be seen in a cinema near you later this year! Oh, and I’m also looking to partner with an overseas acting agency or manager right now.
the patches—mismatched pieces filling in
People tend to have different passions in life. What bakes one person’s beans might not, in fact, bake someone else’s beans to quite the same level of bakedness and/or bakeosity. Some people don’t even like beans. Some people eat beans and get all gassy and smelly. The point is, beans are pretty awesome, especially if you put hot dogs in them. Wait, no, that’s not the point.
Last month I went for an MRI because my head is constantly hurting but I just got the results in yesterday and everything is fine. My doctor thinks its a variety of things such as stress (I have been feeling stressed about so many things lately), constantly reading, and TMJ. Both my family doctor and dentist recommend I start going for massages. So I did............YESTERDAY......and it was so relaxing...it was costly but I am planning on continuing this hah! I also went out for dinner last night with two girlfriends I haven't seen in a couple of months. It was sooo nice to dine and laugh!
I wrote it on an assignment for English class a few weeks ago. The assignment was to write about a physical object but make it into something more, which wasn’t really hard for me. I was thinking of an old photo I’ve seen a handful of times of my paternal grandmother, only a few years before she died, which incidentally happens to be when she was close to the age I am now.
Needless to say, it is pretty tough to please the whole crowd. In case that is not enough to keep a gal on her toes, last night the girls had a friend over – so we had nine to feed. And we had our first 80 degree day of the year, so turning on the oven seemed counter productive to the efforts to keep the house cool. When you are a family of two or three, you can make last minute decisions and substitute different dishes than the one you had planned to make. That is tougher to do when cooking for eight (or on this particular night – nine.) Not to worry – I had a stroke of genius. I would simply make taco salad. We had all of the needed ingredients on hand. I would not need to turn on the oven. It was quick and easy AND my brood could pick and choose only adding what they liked to their salad. Taylor could skip the tomatoes. Justin could skip the tomatoes and the beans but have plenty of corn. Landon could go heavy on the meat and beans but forego the veggies. etc. I got it all on the table and in plenty of time for everyone to make it to rehearsal. As I sat down to dinner quite pleased with myself, I looked around the table and saw each face fall. What?! “I thought you all liked taco salad.” And then my oldest and most sympathetic bonus child looked at me and said, “Oh we do. It’s just that this is what we had last night at mom’s house.” How could I have known?! Drat! Back to the drawing board. Tonight I am trying sweet orange chicken. At least I know that’s not what they had last night.
Beware folks of the word "Partnership" when it is excessively bandied about in a business meeting, by the client. In my experience, if a customer insists they want you to be their "Partner" that usually translates into:
I do see my food relaxing a bit. Not the day to day, but maybe having dessert sometimes when out to dinner with friends or family. I imagine living a life as a normal person involves being mindful of nutrition but not a slave to food anymore. I realize very firmly that this is a lifelong process and I need to remain mindful while still enjoying food. I believe my plateau here for the past month has shown me that I can and will be royalty when it comes to maintenance. *wink*
Finally my baby is home!!! Now what, oh yeah, watch him sleep for hours, after hours, after hours. While baby slept, I read anything and everything I could about what I should do in order to be the perfect mom as well as what to expect as far as milestones. For some reason I forgot everything I should be doing (which is different for everyone anyways) andd I’m not sure how or why, but I engraved these lovely little milestones into my brain. Now, having had a preemie this is not a good thing to do. Every baby grows at his/her own pace, especially preemies. My son will be 5 months soon and I still have to constantly remind myself that just because my friends baby started eating before mine, or sits up before mine, or stands before mine…my baby is still perfect! He will eat, sit up, and stand before I know it and when he is good and ready. In the mean time, I will enjoy every moment that we have laying in bed playing together because before soon I will be chasing after him wishing he would just lay and snuggle with me for a little while. If you must look at the milestone charts…use your baby’s corrected age. Preemies are very special babies that come to this world early and require a little extra time and attention…this is not necessarily a bad thing.
1. Enoteca Sociale’s Baked Kale appetizer – I have been wanting to eat at this restaurant for some time now, and got the chance this week. After ordering some appetizers to share, my fellow diners and I decided that we could eat this baked kale dish with oyster mushrooms, persimmon and pine nuts every day of the week! Who knew kale could taste THAT good! At 1288 Dundas West in Toronto.
Denise shuffled her weight in the chair. “Rob and I have a difference of opinion. I’d like the three of us to sit down and discuss it.”
-Some of our insecurities as moms (mommy brain, negativity, etc)
So, basically what I'm saying, as long winded as possible, is that I don't have much to say today about this coffee cake. It's delicious. It stays moist. It's a recipe I've tried many times with no fail. It cooks in a bundt pan, which I love. It has a delicious cinnamon and pecan filling. But that's all I can think to write about it.
I'm including a link to the radio player. For email subscribers just copy and paste the url link into your web browser and find it there. It's all about "letting go of your but" and recognising and getting past the excuses we often make for not doing the things we want to do. It is a wonderful topic and I hope you enjoy it and I hope it helps you realise and move past the excuses you make for not going after all the things you really want in life!
The big ticket Jewelry has been worn by everyone from Elizabeth Taylor to Kate Winslet. But just about anyone can own a piece of Tiffany’s silver line, starting at about $100.
The lobster eye is composed of numerous squares. These well-arranged squares are in fact the ends of tiny square tubes. The sides of each one of these square tubes are like mirrors that reflect the incoming light. This reflected light is focused onto the retina flawlessly. The sides of the tubes inside the eye are lodged at such perfect angles that they all focus onto a single point.
Personal photo taken in Galena, IL
Where: 407 Radam, Austin
FG=1.010@68F
One of the things that I have heard in Al-Anon for years is that by staying busy, I get better. But as in everything, there is a need for balance. Being frantically busy is not what I want to do. I did that for many years, running from my problems by juggling so many things. So this weekend, I will do the usual things that bring me comfort. And that includes getting more rest.
Lazarus was dead!
P.S. After a week of frosty mornings, it’s warm again. Peas, pole beans, lettuce and radishes have popped. I’m waiting on spinach, cabbage, cauliflower, beets, kale and brussel sprouts. Looks like the grapes took a hit and got frostbitten. Time will tell.
if you can hear me,
She's American and I love the language, our differences and our inherent sameness.
After a few months, I knew this was light years ahead of any other relationship I'd had in the past. I had been in love before but never like this. After four months of dating, we took our first vacation together. (Belize!) After only six months of dating, we got an apartment together. After a year and a half of dating, we got engaged. And we were married just days before the two-year anniversary of our first date.
Strokes suck. They take away the person you knew and replace them with someone who may or may not remember you (thankfully she does know who we are) and it damages their brains and body. I can't even imagine going from 100% independent and living alone to having to be in a long term care/nursing home by myself and unable to function by myself. Having to relearn to swallow, chew, drink, eat, speak and even walk in some cases has to be mentally, emotionally and physically exhausting. I know for me it is and I have the easy side of this. However anyone who has been a caregiver knows, this its not so easy either.
Don’t forget to leave a comment letting me know that you’re a fan!
“If the proper precautions are taken to secure the animals, then I really don’t have a problem,” Amy said.
It was inspiring and fun to learn about, and put the lie to claims that kids don’t care about what they eat or what’s happening to our food system. I continue to catalogue examples of children who are taking charge of the food they eat and grow. But the Hamilton Spectator story of Oliver Allen-Cillis (and his sister, Piper) has got to be one of the more incredible, mostly because the pair are only six and seven years old.
This little lovie's passion is eating. I am NOT kidding. I have to make him stop in fear of him exploding. He signs "more" after he eats everything. He doesn't get full. Promise. And will eat ANYTHING. so unlike his older brother. You have to beg him to eat.
As any regular reader will know I am fascinated with the transsexual scene in Paris in the late fifties, early sixties, April Ashley, Coccinelle, Bambi and Amanda Lear. All I believe had their surgery with the pioneering Dr. Georges Burou in Casablanca and all went on to fame of varying degrees.
litter box tycoon
“Well…maybe I can get one of the…?” Flamane had only started the sentence when in a flash of fins and splash, it was gone.
Sorry Ingoldmells, who is a person.
Now what on God's earth,
When I got round to watching it, the first things I noticed were the points that make many old films inaccessible. I watched the film with contemporary eyes, having no direct knowledge and experience of the era the film was made in. The fashions stand out, the hats all the guys are wearing; the fact the guy works in an office but has no PC on his desk. What did he do all day with no t'internet to piss about on? The fact that all the executives are white males and the only women are secretaries. All of this type of stuff stands out to me and detracts from the drama. I even notice the lighting black and white films have, lighting up faces to show the actors expressions when the only way that lighting could realistically occur was if when the actor is looking into his child’s cot, the baby is shining a torch back at him. But that’s old black and white films.
For our Thanksgiving Dinner, the star of the show was the Sweet Potato Casserole. I made this recipe, last Thanksgiving, and it was well liked. This year, my son asked if I would make sweet potatoes with marshmallows. Well, I hadn't really planned on it, so I didn't have marshmallows. It was the night before Thanksgiving, when he posed this question. There was no way I was going to hit the grocery store battlegrounds of the Last Minute Thanksgiving Menu craziness.
Fyrinnae - Equality (applied to inner lid with MAC 239 by patting)
I love that he is losing his hair just a little bit
These next articles are going to be all about the choices and alternatives that you can make in your daily life to help you live it to the fullest and age as you should – with a healthy mind as well as a healthy body – sort of like the people I know who live a productive and healthy life in their 70’s, 80’s, 90’s and past the age of 100.
They scrape
Interested!?...Well perhaps it is about time that you learnt about your 'Legal Fiction' / 'Strawman' and how you can stop it being used against you? Knowing about it is the most important first step. You need to go on a journey of discovery, and I'm afraid that what you are about to discover is not very pleasant. However if you decide to act on what you learn here, it will
New Jersey, on the other hand, played solid hockey for most of the season and they are certainly a better team than their sixth seed would suggest. This is not the first time that a sixth seed team is considered a favorite over the much-maligned third seed, but I can’t think of a time where the difference was this great. This series could end quickly.
To lose weight and keep it off successfully, we MUST learn what we can and cannot eat on a regular basis.
Okay fade back in from the wavy image of the flashbacks...... I enjoy the HH period because of the things it implies, when I first made up my mind to start this army, there was none of the Older Marks of armour available from Forge World, except for the Red Scorpion torso & helmet upgrade kit.
A/N: Thanks for my saengie who’s made it for me :3
What blew my mind and left me a bit numb was when I learned that our experience may have played a part in someone else's story. I'm not part of that story in any way but there is circumstantial evidence of the ripple effect happening.
Admittedly I have to say I haven’t been into Starbucks since – though only because Costa is closer & less-packed. In fact I was only reminded of all this when I came across the photo above online. Apparently a guy gave his name as ‘Voldemort’ and this was their comical response. Fair play to the quick-witted barista; that’s the kind of touch that makes you smile.
Meanwhile, Ross, your cards are coming soon. I was waiting to pick up a few more packs and hit more of your needs and I did manage to add a couple of extras. I wish I had more but I'm sending the diamond parallels and all the Heritage extras I had from your wants. I think it unfortunately doesn't total any more than the number of cards you sent.
With that in mind I want to start on a new project. More on this later.
We see this principle of the nature of reality and representation also in the chess pieces he claimed to have carved, he claimed he’d carved the other pieces (pawn, rook, bishop, queen, king) but not the knights, which he claimed somebody else had done who was a skilled craftsman. But through empirical research and ‘reality’ we see that it was actually somewhat the other way around and we can trace here a reversal in that it was the knight that he had carved and the pieces skillfully made on a machine. Skillfully made machine somewhat knights that are in fact made more crudely than the others in ‘reality’, a strange twist to the tale of the real and its representation. Again, as in chess, things are not what they seem and as cut and dry. His knights diverge from those of the orthdox chess world, such as the Staunton figures, popular in the day and those made in the French Regency-St George period. Yet at the same time the pieces besides the knights and the kings, remain somewhat conventional too. Perhaps indicating to posterity, perhaps unintentionally that one can depart from the traditions of the past greatly ( 2 kings and 2 knights) without actually changing that much and still produce freedom, and hence the the Sophian Venusian river rolls through and out of traditions and sometimes departs radically from them, and sometimes alters slightly. I try to incorporate these features in this blog. Thus we shall see old forms and new as well as radical departures. Corruption dodging in the dance of love is the way and as Lady Wisdom and Erotic Love move towards freedom, so do we, for she is ourselves, collectively and individually. This is further reinforced with the knight, mainly horses head, being derived from the shape of an art nouveau violin case, thus linking the change to this artsistic stream of art nouveau and to music, which is very apt when one considers a few things, one, that psychedelic art had its surrealistic and art nouveau edges, not to mention its music (violin case), its victoriana and edwardiana beside, and in these regions of the imagination, in psychedelic poster art, we often see a cosmic dancing Lady figure. Trails of Venus Sophia indeed! Dancing in the most curious places. Also we see elsewhere how Psychedelic poster art somewhat relates not only to Alice in Wonderland (wherein we see chess storyland connected illustrations), lyrics of Jefferson Airplane’s White Rabbit aside, but to the surrealistic version of Alice in Wonderland, the illustrations of Salvador Dali himself (in ’69), which echo the art of him who worked for Hunter Thompson, Ralph Steadman, whose version of the illustated Alice realm of chess story lands in 1967, resonates with Dalis. although Dali had no intention of this, both existing thus, one without each other being aware of the other and resonating. And why make the comparison with things future of Duchamp in his art nouveau violin case knights that have departed from the chess sets of the day? They are also resembling the Futurist tinges of the arts, which in the future indeed onwards from this chess surrealism, comes in the chess tints in the psychedelic as in Steadman’s illustrations of Lewis Carrol and also weaving its way into the psychedelic psyche via the Jefferson Airplane’s White Rabbit and also a chess allusion in Jefferson Starship on their Dragonfly album in the song Be Young You albeit in a negative light, or reflection of a more positive aspect. Jefferson Airplane who arose in the club called the Matrix, is an apt example of how Sophia-Venus leaves her trails in her escape from the classicist prisons that have gone dry and cold, forgotton and lonely, dusty and lost in the shadows, Venus Sophia Cassia emerges out intact with her chessboard through the centuries. Makes sense in a surrealistic and symbolist and even divinatory sense, even histrorically. Artists dont aim to preserve common sense anyway and the after effects of things are a part of the process of artistic way, the gradual footseps and dance of the Lady Sophia-Venus as she dances her way outside of the prison through the lattice gateways, portols and windows, especially shedding her military vestments of chess lexiconography along the way. Besides the art nouveau horse departures into future psychedelic scapes we have the absence of the Christian cross on the crown of the king, and thus the seperation of that which is holy from the imperial might, but then the chess king is holy! Duchamp does this as testament to his anti clericalism, but then perhaps he genuinely knows that the emphasis upon the cross is not set in stone to be the central image of the tradition Christ belonged too and in true surrealistic iconoclasm the central idol of the idolistic version of Christ is done away with for the sake of spiritually letting in the real thing that Christ pointed towards to come back in again. Even inadvertantly, outside the wishes of Duchamp himself. It can be seen like this that even if Duchamp never intended it this way anyway. Its not particularly an antagonistic view to Duchamp’s if he had another in mind too and he does say on the front of the brochure ‘Cannot a new set be designed, that is, without too radical a departure from the traditional figures…. Another feature of his chess set is that the queen and king merge somewhat in looking alike as a result of the removal of the cross. The Sophian and Venusian and feminine aspects of Holy Spirit and Christ resemble each other perhaps in a non androgynous state, perhaps in an all female appearing as a male and female duality theme, whatever his intentions are, we can see this way, why not? In chess story land it is so. An emasculated king we may ask? Even that too. Keep the meanings of what he meant and what it means to us open. Multifaceted. Many in the tourney exhibition of 32, especially on various different levels would have agreed with this approach, and lets not forget that here is an example of that what has happened was a happening back then that even those partaking did not know what was happening, as even we now, looking back in retrospect with our imaginations dancing do also not know what is happening. This exhibition under study, and their sets, the sculpture and paintings and how it assembled and was taken down and what was said about by the participants and other things, these are all different than what Duchamp, or anybody partaking, intended in their setting their stones and frames, iconoclastically into the liquid zone. Fluidity and change and tradition maintained, all in one. What an artistic statement!
The cookies would be delivered to the Day Resource Center in Jessup where families in need go for help. Since homeless families don't have a home much less a kitchen to cook in, having something homebaked for the holidays would be special for them.
The release of this book was pretty timely. Earlier that year I had graduated from college (completely against my will, I might add). I had once imagined that upon graduation I would know exactly where I was going in my life, that there would be a plan, a path, something I could easily settle into and be happy with. Then the day came, and I discovered that the little piece of paper did not include a map for my life. I was on my own. I was totally screwed.
1. Head to Evil World's town, D'taka, and talk to the old man by the well. He'll give you evil poison water, and tell you to infect someone's water source.
Pockets full of posies
His own fatherhood flourished in a household of five women, none of whom were shy about expressing their opinions about any given subject. This list is dedicated to you, Daddy (yes, I’m 36 years old and still call my father “Daddy”)...seven QuickTakes on what Dad did right:
1/2 t garlic powder
BM: As he said, if you wanted the actual reality on the blood, it would be overwhelming after a very short time. People would lose track of the rest of the story if you had soldiers wading through blood.
This man turbocharged my understanding of Indian cuisine. He showed me that Indian food is about spices and that the sooner I gain real knowledge about such spices the better it will be for me (and those of you who eat my food!).
I love coffee, strong and black.
Tony Robbins is the bomb.
But a mediocre book by James Sallis is worth about 10 by anybody else. He’s simply one of the finest crime writers in American letters.
2. Pray. When Jesus died on the cross, the veil that covered access to the Holy of Holies (in the temple) was torn and we no longer needed a mediator. Prayer is the direct link to the creator of the Universe.
The audience was much thicker when The Belle Brigade hit the stage. They too were equally unclassifiable, but their foundation was country as opposed to rock. The Belle Brigade’s self-titled record is very mellow, relaxing, and highly acclaimed for its charm. Despite preparing for what could’ve been a really unenergetic set, lead singer Barbara Gruska was pleasantly surprising. As a childlike innocent whose persona melted into the hearts of the audience, she was everything you could want in a lead singer. The Belle Brigade had a comfortable rapport with the audience that included jokes and banter, and when they left the stage, they left a part of themselves as well.
These boar chops differed a bit in cut from the ones in the class, but I thought they’d do quite nicely. There were four chops with small bones – nice and thin, and a bit small, which told me that these came from a smaller pig, which is what I’d been told to look for. I rubbed them with sea salt, pepper, oregano and thyme, and fired up the grill.
- Dill
My interest piqued, I asked Viola Fort, one of the two founders of the magazine, if she would be prepared to give me an interview - and she kindly agreed.
One of Dom's first orders of business is his transition into retirement following his recent move to Kure Beach, NC. During the coming academic year, we intend to properly honor him to celebrate his friendship and his many contributions to GW athletics.
Maine-Vermont-New Hampshire
Student : That is it sir . . . exactly! The link between man and God is faith. That is all that keeps things alive and moving.
It doesn't require any obscure ingredients (think 'can of tomato soup' rather than 'white truffle oil').
We are determined . . . to take possession of the United States, and rule them; but we cannot do that without acting secretly and with utmost wisdom.
Again, this is barely significant in a statistical sense. There was one control, showing that these results were not correlated with the degree of a student’s religious belief measured several weeks before the test.
How long, how long, in infinite Pursuit
Visually, the book is an interesting hybrid. Writer George Perez does breakdowns, and the storytelling, with multiple small panels on almost every page, is pure Perez. It's dense, but never confusing. The pencil and ink art by Jesus Merino looks like an accomplished Jim Lee impersonation. Actually, I like Merino's art better than Lee's.
When I branched out from Husband's business and started finding work of my own accord, I earned cash designing business cards (here are some examples, although most of these were pro-bono, come to think of it), and I designed some T-shirts and a plane logo back in the day (you can see them here, although again, some of them were pro-bono as well). I've done brochures and flyers and letterheads for cash, and I've done book covers for African trade beads, which are almost as good as cash when you think about it. Mostly, my work is for free or for the cost of lunch or a cup of coffee or a bouquet of flowers or a box of candy or even just the satisfaction of a job well done for a well-deserving cause.
The guests were asked to write a short passage of something they loved about them.
*Work only 8 hours
If the Steelers were victorious,
I’m thinking it must be dimmer trick
at the door. Please note that space is limited so arrive early.
A popular poll and TV programme in 2004 captured this reality in a snapshot. SABC 3 ran a poll named "100 Great South Africans" which was open to the general public to make submissions and nominate their particular favourite. The results were appalling, yet credible.
Memphis
These are a result of the UPC redemption for missing autos from a Gypsy Queen case group break in which I had the Mets. So the new totals for me from that case are: 1 Stamp Jon Niese, 2 Angel Pagan Autos, 1 Santana Framed Card, lots of minis and lots of base. Not bad.
According to one interview, he had been introduced to Jimmy Sangster by ‘a friend at Radio 1’, who had merely observed that he had the right look for horror films. Sangster was then at work on Horror of Frankenstein and told Raven he had no role for him but that he’d keep him in mind. According to this account, Raven thought no more of it, and was genuinely surprised when he received the offer to make Lust For a Vampire.
I still recall when next to the Batman and Superman comics I loved there was a new comic. It was called “Fantastic Four”. I think that was in 1962 when I was almost six years old. How exciting those guys were in their flying cars.
I’m not sure how anonymous reporting creates a culture of trust and accountability, but in any event, many an HR director or ombuds will tell you that it’s awfully hard to do a fair and thorough investigation based on such reports — especially for a targeted form of mistreatment such as workplace bullying.
According to the opinion of the court by Circuit Judge Dyk:
Im starting to try and talk with a quiet group of guys in my class but the thing is the 3 of them hang together and talk between themselfs but they totally should be more confident and move around because they are all actually quite funny! awesome guys! great personalities all 3 of them….. so im working on them!! getting them involved a bit with everyone…. i plan on be-friending them! hahahaha
Thankfully, Ninja was back to normal and going potty in his box again the next day. No problems since. And in the meantime, we've been calling Doogie FrankenKitty and FrankenDoog. He does look like a bit like Frankenstein, don't you think? Poor baby. He's such a trooper.
January. Winter. Cold. Makes you want to stay indoors curled up in a comfortable chair with a cup of tea, a good book and favorite afghan thrown over your legs. I haven't been in my garden since its annual clean up and winterizing ritual and haven't thought much about it until this week. Small branches and twigs had fallen and collected in an unkempt pile in my yard so I ventured out one relatively mild day to clean them up. In the process I discovered something surprising. My daffodils, well over a hundred of them, are beginning to poke through the ground. My old (over 10 years) strawberry plant is showing signs of green under the dessicated remains of last year's growth. My stalwart sedum (I swear you can't kill this plant) is coming back again as it has for over 15 years and the tender plants that I brought into the house in the fall are showing signs of renewed vigor. It appears the growing season has quietly arrived and is in full throttle.
It took Blossom, oh, five minutes of living in Perth to decide that she couldn't entertain the thought of cooking without a Thermomix.
For the foundations of the earth are the LORD’s;
In the long run by-elections, no matter how important at the time, never really amount to much, just blips on the radar. This one could have been different, could have shaken the complacency of Westminster. As Andrew Gilligan wrote in the Telegraph, it’s a shame that it has been so thoroughly contaminated by the politics of religion. Contaminated also, I would add, by lies and naked demagoguery. Our democratic culture is the lesser for this shabby hypocrite’s ascent. For him I have absolutely no respect.
Really, though, college is going to be a big step for me and my friends. Now, I never considered myself to be the “brainy kid” from my group of friends (ingroups vs outgroups, you read about this in psychology classes. Basically in your own groups, ingroups, you see yourselves as individuals, while in outgroups, you see everyone else sharing certain traits). Now, if I had paid more attention to my schooling, I probably could have been a lot better off now. Possibly even gotten into an Ivy, who knows? Some of my friends have been admitted to MIT, Caltech, Columbia, UPenn, Berkeley, Cornell, Harvard… yeah, you get the picture. I am happy for them, I really am. Originally I wanted to apply to Columbia and UPenn. But I realized, they weren’t for me. While I love what the schools have to offer, they weren’t me. What do I mean? Well, basically, I mean that I need a bit more out of my life than just straight up schoolwork. Granted, I have been in a very prestigious program for high school. I scored higher on my SAT than my friends who attended different schools who had higher GPAs than I did at the time of taking it. Out of my group of friends at my school though, I scored lower than everyone else. Maybe because I only took it one time, but I was happy with my score. I thought I was going to do a lot worse. And grades? Well, I stopped caring, because I needed a balance between school and personal life, which you could argue I still have not completely found. My grades, well, honestly, I stopped caring because of a lot of things in my home life made me wake up and realize I did not have a balance that made me happy. I ran from one extreme to the other trying to avoid each, and ended up collapsing in between the two.
i was most excited to see it more than any other place, but i had no desire while we were there because i was so pooped!
To put the icing on the cake, Berkeley took nine days to shoot the number instead of the scheduled five, and he ran $60,000 over its budget.
When I first encountered the work of Christian Holstad (b. 1972), I was struck by the works' formal and graphic success, and only discovered the importance of specific materials and underlying meanings after perusing these articles.
AB 1014 exempts breweries from unnecessary and burdensome building requirements that were designed for food facilities but not relevant to improve the safety of brewery tasting rooms. Previously, craft brewers wishing to have a tasting room at the brewery would be required to install several industrial sinks, redo plumbing and electrical wiring among other requirements, simply to provide beer samples. These renovations can cost tens to hundreds of thousands of dollars creating a huge burden for small breweries.
I opened my mouth to say good bye when she interrupted.
and bloom.
And then my little artist brain pipes up, the little cruel artist brain that knows how suffering wrings you out and then pushes you on, harder than before. Maybe it’s good for us to feel this way, once in a while. It’s not at all good that this has happened, but a disaster on this scale reconnects Godzone to the harsh, real world. Despite the images and people coming from outside, and the national obsession with travel, there’s still sometimes a feeling that this is the last safe place on earth, a place that’s clean and green and wrapped in cotton wool. A disaster on this scale shows us that safety can turn to danger in an instant. A crack has opened up on these islands of ours and suddenly we know what it’s like to be without communication, without security, fearing for our very lives. We’re no longer distant from what we see on our screens.
"Hey, Al, how you doing?"
Quite pale, with delicate peach & blossom aromas. Some citrus notes too.
That's why we all have Thanksgiving
I am, however, beyond sad to know that the brilliant editorial team will be broken up. Maurice Lyon, the editorial director was the person who saw the potential in When I Was Joe, when other publishers doubted the market for 'gritty realism'. Every award it has won (five), every nomination and short-listing it has achieved (a further 14) probably would not have happened without Maurice. He and I were jointly shortlisted for the Branford Boase award. When I Was Joe earned back its advance within a year, it has sold nearly 20,000 copies. I'm not saying any of this to boast, just to show that Maurice's instincts seem to have been proved right.
The police officer who had been up all night partying with his police buddies, colleagues and did they all drive drunk home as well now? The Police often visted the Police tavern.. many cops are alcoholics undeniably now too.. Unacceptable still.
It has been FOREVER.
I once thought Barack Obama was just unqualified and ill-suited by experience and viewpoint from holding the highest office in the land, simply yet another in a long line of democrat party cardboard cutouts who have repeated the same Socialist boilerplate for fifty years, only in a better suit and with better speech writers. The stuff about turning back the rising tides, and bringing peace, brotherhood, and a chicken in every pot was just the sort of thing you’d expect a liberal politician to say. His mantra of Hope and Change was simply a recycling of every political bromide ever uttered since the days of Julius Caesar. Barack Obama, I thought, was always a creation of the Media; just someone with an interesting biography (that someone else wrote for him), or who gave a good speech (written by someone else) who would either grow into the job, by being constrained by cooler heads in Congress or the realities of the Constitutional System.
Bro and I followed through with Dad's wishes to be cremated, like Mom was. We decided that we never thought of them as separate, but together. Their marriage really was a unity. So, we had their ashes mixed together, and then split in half, so each of us could do what we wished with the remains. My portion of Mom and Dad still sit in the box in the pretty felt bag I got from the funeral home in NM. Sis bought a beautiful box to put the remains in... and I will move them... eventually. I have offered part of my half to Mom's two sisters, if they wish to scatter some of the ashes in some special place that means something to them.
A cursory unthinking swipe
Kim Kardashian took headlines by storm this week when she said on her reality show that she might consider running for Mayor of Glendale someday. The city of Glendale, sometimes referred to as “Little Armenia” by locals, is very close to where I grew up–in the same congressional district, in fact. Congressman Adam Schiff represents the district, and so I thought I’d poke a little fun at him and the situation.
3 laps around the track
He watched his friends marry and have children, shipping gifts to them overseas from wherever in the world he happened to be writing at the time. Each occasion reverberated in his mind like some alarm clock to which he was forever running late.
wireless earphones for ipod The Waterproof Waterfi Shuffle is the most versatile Waterproof MP3 Player available. You can listen to your favorite songs in high fidelity underwater in the pool, ocean, gym, snow, rain, and use it as your everyday MP3 Player! The Waterfi Shuffle is the most tested, reliable and long lasting waterproof MP3 Player available. Over 15,000 swimmers love it.
Spring break is over. So are all the dentist appointments (Hooray! I'm grateful for you dentist...but still).
'LONG LIVE THE REVOLUTION!'
But sadly, everyone I've ever seen has never been in the store since being featured in this newspaper. I think having their picture posted in it scares some of them into ever venturing into public places again.
Evidently, Andrew woke up about that time and helped Dennis wrap his presents to me.
The most boo-boos kissed
Take one, take them all.
~ Don’t hurry, don’t worry and take time to smell the flowers~
Salt and freshly ground pepper to taste
Pancho, Pippin, Habib, Genevieve, Lampshade, and You Think of Something are some of my favorite people. We gather on occasion for dinner parties where we mostly talk about work. You see, we are all members of the teaching profession in various neighboring communities. So no matter how hard we try, we tend to revert back to our area of common interest.
Diner
However, you may have noticed some changes to the security arrangements for this evening’s entertainment. In the past, if you were unlucky a particularly officious steward might have a Hard Look at your badge. I remember one year having some trouble convincing one fellow that my likeness had been taken whilst my moustache was benefiting from the lush pastures of the Welland Valley.
yet still my heart is held in thrall,
Corner of Underhill and Sterling
I was healed and my heart
My grandmother was a painter and had many art books which are now at my family home. As I flipped through some books I came across a Picasso poster, neatly folded into fours, that was between the pages. I opened it up to find the poster below; a 1970 art exhibition poster with the name Mourlot printed at the bottom.
You can find the whole series, sixteen episodes, on youtube (& elsewhere), with lazy subbing. They don't translate when the characters are speaking sometimes, but they translate more than enough for English speakers to understand.
For instance, when my brother consistently uses drugs, he becomes a completely different person who I do not identify with, nor feel is my brother. When in wilderness (i.e., rehab), he wrote us letters and, with each letter we received, it seemed that he was improving and returning to his old self. Even though I was hesitant to let him back in my life, my entire family was convinced that he was getting better, that everything would be fine, we could all stop worrying. By seeing this progress, we believed that he was returning to who he was.
In the meantime, newly-single Enid has decided to stop feeling sorry for herself and go to the dance even though she no longer has a date. While she's getting ready, the doorbell rings and who should appear, only George all dressed up in a fancy blazer and slacks. He heard she was now single and conveniently, he's now a great big ride and is taking her to the dance so they shift the faces off each other. While her Mam is still there from what I can gather. Anyway, yay Enid!
David Bowie sent a letter to the committee of Rock And Roll Hall Of Fame recommending that Mick Ronson should be inducted. Unfortunately, seeing that the Hall doesn’t have good enough taste to induct the Cure, Rush and many others, we may have a long wait.
But just seeing cannot transform
Cars blared their horns behind her and she thought she might have heard a explitive or two but she just couldn’t force herself to go any faster or even for that matter drive at all. She was frozen in time and place as she took in the depth and breadth of the sight just over the edge. Her stomach knotted and her breath came quick as she peered at the sparkling ocean far below her.
**Disclaimer:
We are also authorized users of the US Post Office Co-Palletization program that combines your mail on the same truck with other mailers that are going to further reaching destinations when you don’t have enough mail to merit your trucking directly by yourself. This means full trucks, postage savings and saved resources.
It was odd that the boss had me interviewing this person.
1. It has a camera.
Otherwise, part three is the most enjoyable of the three action movie sequels to the original psychological thriller. At one poit, it hel the Guiness Book of World Records title for the most violent film ever, with 236 separate acts of violence ad 110 people killed onscreen. The title has since been handed off--to Rambo, the fourth and final film in the franchise.
“What do you want to think about?”
In my nearly six years in the United Methodist Church, the number one question I receive from people who are affiliated with my former Southern Baptist denomination is “Do Methodists believe you can lose your salvation?” Growing up in the Baptist church, we were always big on doctrine and knowing what we believed and how scripture supports that. I’m thankful for this training in the Bible even though a small handful of my views have changed. So back to the question at hand. Are believers saved once and for all, or is there opportunity for them to “fall from grace” or turn their back on their faith.
Under Article 21 of the E-Commerce Directive, the European Commission is obliged to re-examine the Directive every two years, proposing changes if necessary to adapt it to legal, technical and economic developments. Unfortunately only one report was ever produced. Another was planned for last year but has not yet materialized. When I asked why, the Commission told me it was its ‘prerogative’ to decide whether to produce reports.
5. The Wunder Years - The Lonely Vampires Club
I wasn't a fan of the wire mesh, but knew I'd be able to remove it. What really appealed to me was the shape. I like that the buffet is up on legs, so it doesn't feel too heavy. That's one of the main things I was looking for when I was searching the listings. I also like that it has mostly clean lines, but with a few pretty curves for a feminine touch.
Van Horne accomplished this feat by pushing his construction crews hard. Some called him a tyrant. Others described him the way the German composer Richard Wagner described Beethoven, as a titan wrestling with the gods.
Oh, no wait, that wasn’t how she phrased it. I’m sure it had some wonderful praise in there (because she’s really good with the flattery), and then a bunch of questions for an interview on her blog that she’s sharing with a few other awesome ’13 debut writers.
~Uncle Terry
2 tablespoons cooking oil
Woke up this morning to sunshine, the sound of the ocean in my ears, and a sleepy husband beside me... Oh wait, that was my life last week. Today, I woke up freezing and alone. Haze and frost filled my window and the last thing I wanted to do was get out from under my warm covers. It's always bittersweet coming home from vacation.
In the end, the SNP decided that Glaswegians such as me were not good enough as outsiders were seen as more preferable.
